Revelation

1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 This noteless version of the NET Bible is provided free by Bible.org donors. Be sure to check out the full NET Bible with 60,932 translators' notes and visit http://net.bible.org to use the full NET Bible Study Environment.

Revelation
Chapter 1

The Prologue

1:1 The revelation of Jesus Christ, which God gave him to show his servants what must happen very soon. He made it clear by sending his angel to his servant John, 1:2 who then testified to everything that he saw concerning the word of God and the testimony about Jesus Christ. 1:3 Blessed is the one who reads the words of this prophecy aloud, and blessed are those who hear and obey the things written in it, because the time is near!

1:4 From John, to the seven churches that are in the province of Asia: Grace and peace to you from “he who is,” and who was, and who is still to come, and from the seven spirits who are before his throne, 1:5 and from Jesus Christ – the faithful witness, the firstborn from among the dead, the ruler over the kings of the earth. To the one who loves us and has set us free from our sins at the cost of his own blood 1:6 and has appointed us as a kingdom, as priests serving his God and Father – to him be the glory and the power for ever and ever! Amen.

1:7 (Look! He is returning with the clouds,

and every eye will see him,

even those who pierced him,

and all the tribes on the earth will mourn because of him.

This will certainly come to pass! Amen.)

1:8 “I am the Alpha and the Omega,” says the Lord God – the one who is, and who was, and who is still to come – the All-Powerful!

1:9 I, John, your brother and the one who shares with you in the persecution, kingdom, and endurance that are in Jesus, was on the island called Patmos because of the word of God and the testimony about Jesus. 1:10 I was in the Spirit on the Lord’s Day when I heard behind me a loud voice like a trumpet, 1:11 saying: “Write in a book what you see and send it to the seven churches – to Ephesus, Smyrna, Pergamum, Thyatira, Sardis, Philadelphia, and Laodicea.”

1:12 I turned to see whose voice was speaking to me, and when I did so, I saw seven golden lampstands, 1:13 and in the midst of the lampstands was one like a son of man. He was dressed in a robe extending down to his feet and he wore a wide golden belt around his chest. 1:14 His head and hair were as white as wool, even as white as snow, and his eyes were like a fiery flame. 1:15 His feet were like polished bronze refined in a furnace, and his voice was like the roar of many waters. 1:16 He held seven stars in his right hand, and a sharp double-edged sword extended out of his mouth. His face shone like the sun shining at full strength. 1:17 When I saw him I fell down at his feet as though I were dead, but he placed his right hand on me and said: “Do not be afraid! I am the first and the last, 1:18 and the one who lives! I was dead, but look, now I am alive – forever and ever – and I hold the keys of death and of Hades! 1:19 Therefore write what you saw, what is, and what will be after these things. 1:20 The mystery of the seven stars that you saw in my right hand and the seven golden lampstands is this: The seven stars are the angels of the seven churches and the seven lampstands are the seven churches.

Revelation
Chapter 2

To the Church in Ephesus

2:1 “To the angel of the church in Ephesus, write the following:

“This is the solemn pronouncement of the one who has a firm grasp on the seven stars in his right hand – the one who walks among the seven golden lampstands: 2:2 ‘I know your works as well as your labor and steadfast endurance, and that you cannot tolerate evil. You have even put to the test those who refer to themselves as apostles (but are not), and have discovered that they are false. 2:3 I am also aware that you have persisted steadfastly, endured much for the sake of my name, and have not grown weary. 2:4 But I have this against you: You have departed from your first love! 2:5 Therefore, remember from what high state you have fallen and repent! Do the deeds you did at the first; if not, I will come to you and remove your lampstand from its place – that is, if you do not repent. 2:6 But you do have this going for you: You hate what the Nicolaitans practice – practices I also hate. 2:7 The one who has an ear had better hear what the Spirit says to the churches. To the one who conquers, I will permit him to eat from the tree of life that is in the paradise of God.’

To the Church in Smyrna

2:8 “To the angel of the church in Smyrna write the following:

“This is the solemn pronouncement of the one who is the first and the last, the one who was dead, but came to life: 2:9 ‘I know the distress you are suffering and your poverty (but you are rich). I also know the slander against you by those who call themselves Jews and really are not, but are a synagogue of Satan. 2:10 Do not be afraid of the things you are about to suffer. The devil is about to have some of you thrown into prison so you may be tested, and you will experience suffering for ten days. Remain faithful even to the point of death, and I will give you the crown that is life itself. 2:11 The one who has an ear had better hear what the Spirit says to the churches. The one who conquers will in no way be harmed by the second death.’

To the Church in Pergamum

2:12 “To the angel of the church in Pergamum write the following:

“This is the solemn pronouncement of the one who has the sharp double-edged sword: 2:13 ‘I know where you live – where Satan’s throne is. Yet you continue to cling to my name and you have not denied your faith in me, even in the days of Antipas, my faithful witness, who was killed in your city where Satan lives. 2:14 But I have a few things against you: You have some people there who follow the teaching of Balaam, who instructed Balak to put a stumbling block before the people of Israel so they would eat food sacrificed to idols and commit sexual immorality. 2:15 In the same way, there are also some among you who follow the teaching of the Nicolaitans. 2:16 Therefore, repent! If not, I will come against you quickly and make war against those people with the sword of my mouth. 2:17 The one who has an ear had better hear what the Spirit says to the churches. To the one who conquers, I will give him some of the hidden manna, and I will give him a white stone, and on that stone will be written a new name that no one can understand except the one who receives it.’

To the Church in Thyatira

2:18 “To the angel of the church in Thyatira write the following:

“This is the solemn pronouncement of the Son of God, the one who has eyes like a fiery flame and whose feet are like polished bronze: 2:19 ‘I know your deeds: your love, faith, service, and steadfast endurance. In fact, your more recent deeds are greater than your earlier ones. 2:20 But I have this against you: You tolerate that woman Jezebel, who calls herself a prophetess, and by her teaching deceives my servants to commit sexual immorality and to eat food sacrificed to idols. 2:21 I have given her time to repent, but she is not willing to repent of her sexual immorality. 2:22 Look! I am throwing her onto a bed of violent illness, and those who commit adultery with her into terrible suffering, unless they repent of her deeds. 2:23 Furthermore, I will strike her followers with a deadly disease, and then all the churches will know that I am the one who searches minds and hearts. I will repay each one of you what your deeds deserve. 2:24 But to the rest of you in Thyatira, all who do not hold to this teaching (who have not learned the so-called “deep secrets of Satan”), to you I say: I do not put any additional burden on you. 2:25 However, hold on to what you have until I come. 2:26 And to the one who conquers and who continues in my deeds until the end, I will give him authority over the nations – 

2:27 he will rule them with an iron rod

and like clay jars he will break them to pieces,

2:28 just as I have received the right to rule from my Father – and I will give him the morning star. 2:29 The one who has an ear had better hear what the Spirit says to the churches.’

Revelation
Chapter 3

To the Church in Sardis

3:1 “To the angel of the church in Sardis write the following:

“This is the solemn pronouncement of the one who holds the seven spirits of God and the seven stars: ‘I know your deeds, that you have a reputation that you are alive, but in reality you are dead. 3:2 Wake up then, and strengthen what remains that was about to die, because I have not found your deeds complete in the sight of my God. 3:3 Therefore, remember what you received and heard, and obey it, and repent. If you do not wake up, I will come like a thief, and you will never know at what hour I will come against you. 3:4 But you have a few individuals in Sardis who have not stained their clothes, and they will walk with me dressed in white, because they are worthy. 3:5 The one who conquers will be dressed like them in white clothing, and I will never erase his name from the book of life, but will declare his name before my Father and before his angels. 3:6 The one who has an ear had better hear what the Spirit says to the churches.’

To the Church in Philadelphia

3:7 “To the angel of the church in Philadelphia write the following:

“This is the solemn pronouncement of the Holy One, the True One, who holds the key of David, who opens doors no one can shut, and shuts doors no one can open: 3:8 ‘I know your deeds. (Look! I have put in front of you an open door that no one can shut.) I know that you have little strength, but you have obeyed my word and have not denied my name. 3:9 Listen! I am going to make those people from the synagogue of Satan – who say they are Jews yet are not, but are lying – Look, I will make them come and bow down at your feet and acknowledge that I have loved you. 3:10 Because you have kept my admonition to endure steadfastly, I will also keep you from the hour of testing that is about to come on the whole world to test those who live on the earth. 3:11 I am coming soon. Hold on to what you have so that no one can take away your crown. 3:12 The one who conquers I will make a pillar in the temple of my God, and he will never depart from it. I will write on him the name of my God and the name of the city of my God (the new Jerusalem that comes down out of heaven from my God), and my new name as well. 3:13 The one who has an ear had better hear what the Spirit says to the churches.’

To the Church in Laodicea

3:14 “To the angel of the church in Laodicea write the following:

“This is the solemn pronouncement of the Amen, the faithful and true witness, the originator of God’s creation: 3:15 ‘I know your deeds, that you are neither cold nor hot. I wish you were either cold or hot! 3:16 So because you are lukewarm, and neither hot nor cold, I am going to vomit you out of my mouth! 3:17 Because you say, “I am rich and have acquired great wealth, and need nothing,” but do not realize that you are wretched, pitiful, poor, blind, and naked, 3:18 take my advice and buy gold from me refined by fire so you can become rich! Buy from me white clothing so you can be clothed and your shameful nakedness will not be exposed, and buy eye salve to put on your eyes so you can see! 3:19 All those I love, I rebuke and discipline. So be earnest and repent! 3:20 Listen! I am standing at the door and knocking! If anyone hears my voice and opens the door I will come into his home and share a meal with him, and he with me. 3:21 I will grant the one who conquers permission to sit with me on my throne, just as I too conquered and sat down with my Father on his throne. 3:22 The one who has an ear had better hear what the Spirit says to the churches.’”

Revelation
Chapter 4

The Amazing Scene in Heaven

4:1 After these things I looked, and there was a door standing open in heaven! And the first voice I had heard speaking to me like a trumpet said: “Come up here so that I can show you what must happen after these things.” 4:2 Immediately I was in the Spirit, and a throne was standing in heaven with someone seated on it! 4:3 And the one seated on it was like jasper and carnelian in appearance, and a rainbow looking like it was made of emerald encircled the throne. 4:4 In a circle around the throne were twenty-four other thrones, and seated on those thrones were twenty-four elders. They were dressed in white clothing and had golden crowns on their heads. 4:5 From the throne came out flashes of lightning and roaring and crashes of thunder. Seven flaming torches, which are the seven spirits of God, were burning in front of the throne 4:6 and in front of the throne was something like a sea of glass, like crystal.

In the middle of the throne and around the throne were four living creatures full of eyes in front and in back. 4:7 The first living creature was like a lion, the second creature like an ox, the third creature had a face like a man’s, and the fourth creature looked like an eagle flying. 4:8 Each one of the four living creatures had six wings and was full of eyes all around and inside. They never rest day or night, saying:

“Holy Holy Holy is the Lord God, the All-Powerful,

Who was and who is, and who is still to come!”

4:9 And whenever the living creatures give glory, honor, and thanks to the one who sits on the throne, who lives forever and ever, 4:10 the twenty-four elders throw themselves to the ground before the one who sits on the throne and worship the one who lives forever and ever, and they offer their crowns before his throne, saying:

4:11 “You are worthy, our Lord and God,

to receive glory and honor and power,

since you created all things,

and because of your will they existed and were created!”

Revelation
Chapter 5

The Opening of the Scroll

5:1 Then I saw in the right hand of the one who was seated on the throne a scroll written on the front and back and sealed with seven seals. 5:2 And I saw a powerful angel proclaiming in a loud voice: “Who is worthy to open the scroll and to break its seals?” 5:3 But no one in heaven or on earth or under the earth was able to open the scroll or look into it. 5:4 So I began weeping bitterly because no one was found who was worthy to open the scroll or to look into it. 5:5 Then one of the elders said to me, “Stop weeping! Look, the Lion of the tribe of Judah, the root of David, has conquered; thus he can open the scroll and its seven seals.”

5:6 Then I saw standing in the middle of the throne and of the four living creatures, and in the middle of the elders, a Lamb that appeared to have been killed. He had seven horns and seven eyes, which are the seven spirits of God sent out into all the earth. 5:7 Then he came and took the scroll from the right hand of the one who was seated on the throne, 5:8 and when he had taken the scroll, the four living creatures and the twenty-four elders threw themselves to the ground before the Lamb. Each of them had a harp and golden bowls full of incense (which are the prayers of the saints). 5:9 They were singing a new song:

“You are worthy to take the scroll

and to open its seals

because you were killed, 

and at the cost of your own blood you have purchased for God 

persons from every tribe, language, people, and nation.

5:10 You have appointed them as a kingdom and priests to serve our God, and they will reign on the earth.”

5:11 Then I looked and heard the voice of many angels in a circle around the throne, as well as the living creatures and the elders. Their number was ten thousand times ten thousand – thousands times thousands – 5:12 all of whom were singing in a loud voice:

“Worthy is the lamb who was killed 

to receive power and wealth 

and wisdom and might 

and honor and glory and praise!”

5:13 Then I heard every creature – in heaven, on earth, under the earth, in the sea, and all that is in them – singing:

“To the one seated on the throne and to the Lamb

be praise, honor, glory, and ruling power forever and ever!”

5:14 And the four living creatures were saying “Amen,” and the elders threw themselves to the ground and worshiped.

Revelation
Chapter 6

The Seven Seals

6:1 I looked on when the Lamb opened one of the seven seals, and I heard one of the four living creatures saying with a thunderous voice, “Come!” 6:2 So I looked, and here came a white horse! The one who rode it had a bow, and he was given a crown, and as a conqueror he rode out to conquer.

6:3 Then when the Lamb opened the second seal, I heard the second living creature saying, “Come!” 6:4 And another horse, fiery red, came out, and the one who rode it was granted permission to take peace from the earth, so that people would butcher one another, and he was given a huge sword.

6:5 Then when the Lamb opened the third seal I heard the third living creature saying, “Come!” So I looked, and here came a black horse! The one who rode it had a balance scale in his hand. 6:6 Then I heard something like a voice from among the four living creatures saying, “A quart of wheat will cost a day’s pay and three quarts of barley will cost a day’s pay. But do not damage the olive oil and the wine!”

6:7 Then when the Lamb opened the fourth seal I heard the voice of the fourth living creature saying, “Come!” 6:8 So I looked and here came a pale green horse! The name of the one who rode it was Death, and Hades followed right behind. They were given authority over a fourth of the earth, to kill its population with the sword, famine, and disease, and by the wild animals of the earth.

6:9 Now when the Lamb opened the fifth seal, I saw under the altar the souls of those who had been violently killed because of the word of God and because of the testimony they had given. 6:10 They cried out with a loud voice, “How long, Sovereign Master, holy and true, before you judge those who live on the earth and avenge our blood?” 6:11 Each of them was given a long white robe and they were told to rest for a little longer, until the full number was reached of both their fellow servants and their brothers who were going to be killed just as they had been.

6:12 Then I looked when the Lamb opened the sixth seal, and a huge earthquake took place; the sun became as black as sackcloth made of hair, and the full moon became blood red; 6:13 and the stars in the sky fell to the earth like a fig tree dropping its unripe figs when shaken by a fierce wind. 6:14 The sky was split apart like a scroll being rolled up, and every mountain and island was moved from its place. 6:15 Then the kings of the earth, the very important people, the generals, the rich, the powerful, and everyone, slave and free, hid themselves in the caves and among the rocks of the mountains. 6:16 They said to the mountains and to the rocks, “Fall on us and hide us from the face of the one who is seated on the throne and from the wrath of the Lamb, 6:17 because the great day of their wrath has come, and who is able to withstand it?”

Revelation
Chapter 7

The Sealing of the 144,000

7:1 After this I saw four angels standing at the four corners of the earth, holding back the four winds of the earth so no wind could blow on the earth, on the sea, or on any tree. 7:2 Then I saw another angel ascending from the east, who had the seal of the living God. He shouted out with a loud voice to the four angels who had been given permission to damage the earth and the sea: 7:3 “Do not damage the earth or the sea or the trees until we have put a seal on the foreheads of the servants of our God.” 7:4 Now I heard the number of those who were marked with the seal, one hundred and forty-four thousand, sealed from all the tribes of the people of Israel:

7:5 From the tribe of Judah, twelve thousand were sealed,

from the tribe of Reuben, twelve thousand,

from the tribe of Gad, twelve thousand,

7:6 from the tribe of Asher, twelve thousand,

from the tribe of Naphtali, twelve thousand,

from the tribe of Manasseh, twelve thousand,

7:7 from the tribe of Simeon, twelve thousand,

from the tribe of Levi, twelve thousand,

from the tribe of Issachar, twelve thousand, 

7:8 from the tribe of Zebulun, twelve thousand,

from the tribe of Joseph, twelve thousand,

from the tribe of Benjamin, twelve thousand were sealed. 

7:9 After these things I looked, and here was an enormous crowd that no one could count, made up of persons from every nation, tribe, people, and language, standing before the throne and before the Lamb dressed in long white robes, and with palm branches in their hands. 7:10 They were shouting out in a loud voice,

“Salvation belongs to our God,

to the one seated on the throne, and to the Lamb!”

7:11 And all the angels stood there in a circle around the throne and around the elders and the four living creatures, and they threw themselves down with their faces to the ground before the throne and worshiped God, 7:12 saying,

“Amen! Praise and glory, 

and wisdom and thanksgiving, 

and honor and power and strength 

be to our God for ever and ever. Amen!”

7:13 Then one of the elders asked me, “These dressed in long white robes – who are they and where have they come from?” 7:14 So I said to him, “My lord, you know the answer.” Then he said to me, “These are the ones who have come out of the great tribulation. They have washed their robes and made them white in the blood of the Lamb! 7:15 For this reason they are before the throne of God, and they serve him day and night in his temple, and the one seated on the throne will shelter them. 7:16 They will never go hungry or be thirsty again, and the sun will not beat down on them, nor any burning heat, 7:17 because the Lamb in the middle of the throne will shepherd them and lead them to springs of living water, and God will wipe away every tear from their eyes.”

Revelation
Chapter 8

The Seventh Seal

8:1 Now when the Lamb opened the seventh seal there was silence in heaven for about half an hour. 8:2 Then I saw the seven angels who stand before God, and seven trumpets were given to them. 8:3 Another angel holding a golden censer came and was stationed at the altar. A large amount of incense was given to him to offer up, with the prayers of all the saints, on the golden altar that is before the throne. 8:4 The smoke coming from the incense, along with the prayers of the saints, ascended before God from the angel’s hand. 8:5 Then the angel took the censer, filled it with fire from the altar, and threw it on the earth, and there were crashes of thunder, roaring, flashes of lightning, and an earthquake.

8:6 Now the seven angels holding the seven trumpets prepared to blow them.

8:7 The first angel blew his trumpet, and there was hail and fire mixed with blood, and it was thrown at the earth so that a third of the earth was burned up, a third of the trees were burned up, and all the green grass was burned up.

8:8 Then the second angel blew his trumpet, and something like a great mountain of burning fire was thrown into the sea. A third of the sea became blood, 8:9 and a third of the creatures living in the sea died, and a third of the ships were completely destroyed.

8:10 Then the third angel blew his trumpet, and a huge star burning like a torch fell from the sky; it landed on a third of the rivers and on the springs of water. 8:11 (Now the name of the star is Wormwood.) So a third of the waters became wormwood, and many people died from these waters because they were poisoned.

8:12 Then the fourth angel blew his trumpet, and a third of the sun was struck, and a third of the moon, and a third of the stars, so that a third of them were darkened. And there was no light for a third of the day and for a third of the night likewise. 8:13 Then I looked, and I heard an eagle flying directly overhead, proclaiming with a loud voice, “Woe! Woe! Woe to those who live on the earth because of the remaining sounds of the trumpets of the three angels who are about to blow them!”

Revelation
Chapter 9

9:1 Then the fifth angel blew his trumpet, and I saw a star that had fallen from the sky to the earth, and he was given the key to the shaft of the abyss. 9:2 He opened the shaft of the abyss and smoke rose out of it like smoke from a giant furnace. The sun and the air were darkened with smoke from the shaft. 9:3 Then out of the smoke came locusts onto the earth, and they were given power like that of the scorpions of the earth. 9:4 They were told not to damage the grass of the earth, or any green plant or tree, but only those people who did not have the seal of God on their forehead. 9:5 The locusts were not given permission to kill them, but only to torture them for five months, and their torture was like that of a scorpion when it stings a person. 9:6 In those days people will seek death, but will not be able to find it; they will long to die, but death will flee from them.

9:7 Now the locusts looked like horses equipped for battle. On their heads were something like crowns similar to gold, and their faces looked like men’s faces. 9:8 They had hair like women’s hair, and their teeth were like lions’ teeth. 9:9 They had breastplates like iron breastplates, and the sound of their wings was like the noise of many horse-drawn chariots charging into battle. 9:10 They have tails and stingers like scorpions, and their ability to injure people for five months is in their tails. 9:11 They have as king over them the angel of the abyss, whose name in Hebrew is Abaddon, and in Greek, Apollyon.

9:12 The first woe has passed, but two woes are still coming after these things!

9:13 Then the sixth angel blew his trumpet, and I heard a single voice coming from the horns on the golden altar that is before God, 9:14 saying to the sixth angel, the one holding the trumpet, “Set free the four angels who are bound at the great river Euphrates!” 9:15 Then the four angels who had been prepared for this hour, day, month, and year were set free to kill a third of humanity. 9:16 The number of soldiers on horseback was two hundred million; I heard their number. 9:17 Now this is what the horses and their riders looked like in my vision: The riders had breastplates that were fiery red, dark blue, and sulfurous yellow in color. The heads of the horses looked like lions’ heads, and fire, smoke, and sulfur came out of their mouths. 9:18 A third of humanity was killed by these three plagues, that is, by the fire, the smoke, and the sulfur that came out of their mouths. 9:19 For the power of the horses resides in their mouths and in their tails, because their tails are like snakes, having heads that inflict injuries. 9:20 The rest of humanity, who had not been killed by these plagues, did not repent of the works of their hands, so that they did not stop worshiping demons and idols made of gold, silver, bronze, stone, and wood – idols that cannot see or hear or walk about. 9:21 Furthermore, they did not repent of their murders, of their magic spells, of their sexual immorality, or of their stealing.

Revelation
Chapter 10

The Angel with the Little Scroll

10:1 Then I saw another powerful angel descending from heaven, wrapped in a cloud, with a rainbow above his head; his face was like the sun and his legs were like pillars of fire. 10:2 He held in his hand a little scroll that was open, and he put his right foot on the sea and his left on the land. 10:3 Then he shouted in a loud voice like a lion roaring, and when he shouted, the seven thunders sounded their voices. 10:4 When the seven thunders spoke, I was preparing to write, but just then I heard a voice from heaven say, “Seal up what the seven thunders spoke and do not write it down.” 10:5 Then the angel I saw standing on the sea and on the land raised his right hand to heaven 10:6 and swore by the one who lives forever and ever, who created heaven and what is in it, and the earth and what is in it, and the sea and what is in it, “There will be no more delay! 10:7 But in the days when the seventh angel is about to blow his trumpet, the mystery of God is completed, just as he has proclaimed to his servants the prophets.” 10:8 Then the voice I had heard from heaven began to speak to me again, “Go and take the open scroll in the hand of the angel who is standing on the sea and on the land.” 10:9 So I went to the angel and asked him to give me the little scroll. He said to me, “Take the scroll and eat it. It will make your stomach bitter, but it will be as sweet as honey in your mouth.” 10:10 So I took the little scroll from the angel’s hand and ate it, and it did taste as sweet as honey in my mouth, but when I had eaten it, my stomach became bitter. 10:11 Then they told me: “You must prophesy again about many peoples, nations, languages, and kings.”

Revelation
Chapter 11

The Fate of the Two Witnesses

11:1 Then a measuring rod like a staff was given to me, and I was told, “Get up and measure the temple of God, and the altar, and the ones who worship there. 11:2 But do not measure the outer courtyard of the temple; leave it out, because it has been given to the Gentiles, and they will trample on the holy city for forty-two months. 11:3 And I will grant my two witnesses authority to prophesy for 1,260 days, dressed in sackcloth. 11:4 (These are the two olive trees and the two lampstands that stand before the Lord of the earth.) 11:5 If anyone wants to harm them, fire comes out of their mouths and completely consumes their enemies. If anyone wants to harm them, they must be killed this way. 11:6 These two have the power to close up the sky so that it does not rain during the time they are prophesying. They have power to turn the waters to blood and to strike the earth with every kind of plague whenever they want. 11:7 When they have completed their testimony, the beast that comes up from the abyss will make war on them and conquer them and kill them. 11:8 Their corpses will lie in the street of the great city that is symbolically called Sodom and Egypt, where their Lord was also crucified. 11:9 For three and a half days those from every people, tribe, nation, and language will look at their corpses, because they will not permit them to be placed in a tomb. 11:10 And those who live on the earth will rejoice over them and celebrate, even sending gifts to each other, because these two prophets had tormented those who live on the earth. 11:11 But after three and a half days a breath of life from God entered them, and they stood on their feet, and tremendous fear seized those who were watching them. 11:12 Then they heard a loud voice from heaven saying to them: “Come up here!” So the two prophets went up to heaven in a cloud while their enemies stared at them. 11:13 Just then a major earthquake took place and a tenth of the city collapsed; seven thousand people were killed in the earthquake, and the rest were terrified and gave glory to the God of heaven.

11:14 The second woe has come and gone; the third is coming quickly.

The Seventh Trumpet

11:15 Then the seventh angel blew his trumpet, and there were loud voices in heaven saying:

“The kingdom of the world 

has become the kingdom of our Lord 

and of his Christ, 

and he will reign for ever and ever.”

11:16 Then the twenty-four elders who are seated on their thrones before God threw themselves down with their faces to the ground and worshiped God 11:17 with these words:

“We give you thanks, Lord God, the All-Powerful,

the one who is and who was,

because you have taken your great power

and begun to reign.

11:18 The nations were enraged,

but your wrath has come,

and the time has come for the dead to be judged,

and the time has come to give to your servants, 

the prophets, their reward,

as well as to the saints 

and to those who revere your name, both small and great,

and the time has come to destroy those who destroy the earth.”

11:19 Then the temple of God in heaven was opened and the ark of his covenant was visible within his temple. And there were flashes of lightning, roaring, crashes of thunder, an earthquake, and a great hailstorm.

Revelation
Chapter 12

The Woman, the Child, and the Dragon

12:1 Then a great sign appeared in heaven: a woman clothed with the sun, and with the moon under her feet, and on her head was a crown of twelve stars. 12:2 She was pregnant and was screaming in labor pains, struggling to give birth. 12:3 Then another sign appeared in heaven: a huge red dragon that had seven heads and ten horns, and on its heads were seven diadem crowns. 12:4 Now the dragon’s tail swept away a third of the stars in heaven and hurled them to the earth. Then the dragon stood before the woman who was about to give birth, so that he might devour her child as soon as it was born. 12:5 So the woman gave birth to a son, a male child, who is going to rule over all the nations with an iron rod. Her child was suddenly caught up to God and to his throne, 12:6 and she fled into the wilderness where a place had been prepared for her by God, so she could be taken care of for 1,260 days.

War in Heaven

12:7 Then war broke out in heaven: Michael and his angels fought against the dragon, and the dragon and his angels fought back. 12:8 But the dragon was not strong enough to prevail, so there was no longer any place left in heaven for him and his angels. 12:9 So that huge dragon – the ancient serpent, the one called the devil and Satan, who deceives the whole world – was thrown down to the earth, and his angels along with him. 12:10 Then I heard a loud voice in heaven saying,

“The salvation and the power

and the kingdom of our God, 

and the ruling authority of his Christ, have now come, 

because the accuser of our brothers and sisters, 

the one who accuses them day and night before our God, 

has been thrown down.

12:11 But they overcame him 

by the blood of the Lamb

and by the word of their testimony,

and they did not love their lives so much that they were afraid to die.

12:12 Therefore you heavens rejoice, and all who reside in them!

But woe to the earth and the sea 

because the devil has come down to you! 

He is filled with terrible anger, 

for he knows that he only has a little time!”

12:13 Now when the dragon realized that he had been thrown down to the earth, he pursued the woman who had given birth to the male child. 12:14 But the woman was given the two wings of a giant eagle so that she could fly out into the wilderness, to the place God prepared for her, where she is taken care of – away from the presence of the serpent – for a time, times, and half a time. 12:15 Then the serpent spouted water like a river out of his mouth after the woman in an attempt to sweep her away by a flood, 12:16 but the earth came to her rescue; the ground opened up and swallowed the river that the dragon had spewed from his mouth. 12:17 So the dragon became enraged at the woman and went away to make war on the rest of her children, those who keep God’s commandments and hold to the testimony about Jesus. 12:18 And the dragon stood on the sand of the seashore.

Revelation
Chapter 13

The Two Beasts

13:1 Then I saw a beast coming up out of the sea. It had ten horns and seven heads, and on its horns were ten diadem crowns, and on its heads a blasphemous name. 13:2 Now the beast that I saw was like a leopard, but its feet were like a bear’s, and its mouth was like a lion’s mouth. The dragon gave the beast his power, his throne, and great authority to rule. 13:3 One of the beast’s heads appeared to have been killed, but the lethal wound had been healed. And the whole world followed the beast in amazement; 13:4 they worshiped the dragon because he had given ruling authority to the beast, and they worshiped the beast too, saying: “Who is like the beast?” and “Who is able to make war against him?” 13:5 The beast was given a mouth speaking proud words and blasphemies, and he was permitted to exercise ruling authority for forty-two months. 13:6 So the beast opened his mouth to blaspheme against God – to blaspheme both his name and his dwelling place, that is, those who dwell in heaven. 13:7 The beast was permitted to go to war against the saints and conquer them. He was given ruling authority over every tribe, people, language, and nation, 13:8 and all those who live on the earth will worship the beast, everyone whose name has not been written since the foundation of the world in the book of life belonging to the Lamb who was killed. 13:9 If anyone has an ear, he had better listen! 

13:10 If anyone is meant for captivity,

into captivity he will go.

If anyone is to be killed by the sword,

then by the sword he must be killed.

This requires steadfast endurance and faith from the saints.

13:11 Then I saw another beast coming up from the earth. He had two horns like a lamb, but was speaking like a dragon. 13:12 He exercised all the ruling authority of the first beast on his behalf, and made the earth and those who inhabit it worship the first beast, the one whose lethal wound had been healed. 13:13 He performed momentous signs, even making fire come down from heaven in front of people 13:14 and, by the signs he was permitted to perform on behalf of the beast, he deceived those who live on the earth. He told those who live on the earth to make an image to the beast who had been wounded by the sword, but still lived. 13:15 The second beast was empowered to give life to the image of the first beast so that it could speak, and could cause all those who did not worship the image of the beast to be killed. 13:16 He also caused everyone (small and great, rich and poor, free and slave) to obtain a mark on their right hand or on their forehead. 13:17 Thus no one was allowed to buy or sell things unless he bore the mark of the beast – that is, his name or his number. 13:18 This calls for wisdom: Let the one who has insight calculate the beast’s number, for it is man’s number, and his number is 666.

Revelation
Chapter 14

An Interlude: The Song of the 144,000

14:1 Then I looked, and here was the Lamb standing on Mount Zion, and with him were one hundred and forty-four thousand, who had his name and his Father’s name written on their foreheads. 14:2 I also heard a sound coming out of heaven like the sound of many waters and like the sound of loud thunder. Now the sound I heard was like that made by harpists playing their harps, 14:3 and they were singing a new song before the throne and before the four living creatures and the elders. No one was able to learn the song except the one hundred and forty-four thousand who had been redeemed from the earth. 

14:4 These are the ones who have not defiled themselves with women, for they are virgins. These are the ones who follow the Lamb wherever he goes. These were redeemed from humanity as firstfruits to God and to the Lamb, 14:5 and no lie was found on their lips; they are blameless.

Three Angels and Three Messages

14:6 Then I saw another angel flying directly overhead, and he had an eternal gospel to proclaim to those who live on the earth – to every nation, tribe, language, and people. 14:7 He declared in a loud voice: “Fear God and give him glory, because the hour of his judgment has arrived, and worship the one who made heaven and earth, the sea and the springs of water!”

14:8 A second angel followed the first, declaring: “Fallen, fallen is Babylon the great city! She made all the nations drink of the wine of her immoral passion.”

14:9 A third angel followed the first two, declaring in a loud voice: “If anyone worships the beast and his image, and takes the mark on his forehead or his hand, 14:10 that person will also drink of the wine of God’s anger that has been mixed undiluted in the cup of his wrath, and he will be tortured with fire and sulfur in front of the holy angels and in front of the Lamb. 14:11 And the smoke from their torture will go up forever and ever, and those who worship the beast and his image will have no rest day or night, along with anyone who receives the mark of his name.” 14:12 This requires the steadfast endurance of the saints – those who obey God’s commandments and hold to their faith in Jesus.

14:13 Then I heard a voice from heaven say, “Write this: 

‘Blessed are the dead, 

those who die in the Lord from this moment on!’”

“Yes,” says the Spirit, “so they can rest from their hard work, because their deeds will follow them.”

14:14 Then I looked, and a white cloud appeared, and seated on the cloud was one like a son of man! He had a golden crown on his head and a sharp sickle in his hand. 14:15 Then another angel came out of the temple, shouting in a loud voice to the one seated on the cloud, “Use your sickle and start to reap, because the time to reap has come, since the earth’s harvest is ripe!” 14:16 So the one seated on the cloud swung his sickle over the earth, and the earth was reaped.

14:17 Then another angel came out of the temple in heaven, and he too had a sharp sickle. 14:18 Another angel, who was in charge of the fire, came from the altar and called in a loud voice to the angel who had the sharp sickle, “Use your sharp sickle and gather the clusters of grapes off the vine of the earth, because its grapes are now ripe.” 14:19 So the angel swung his sickle over the earth and gathered the grapes from the vineyard of the earth and tossed them into the great winepress of the wrath of God. 14:20 Then the winepress was stomped outside the city, and blood poured out of the winepress up to the height of horses’ bridles for a distance of almost two hundred miles.

Revelation
Chapter 15

The Final Plagues

15:1 Then I saw another great and astounding sign in heaven: seven angels who have seven final plagues (they are final because in them God’s anger is completed). 

15:2 Then I saw something like a sea of glass mixed with fire, and those who had conquered the beast and his image and the number of his name. They were standing by the sea of glass, holding harps given to them by God. 15:3 They sang the song of Moses the servant of God and the song of the Lamb:

“Great and astounding are your deeds,

Lord God, the All-Powerful!

Just and true are your ways,

King over the nations!

15:4 Who will not fear you, O Lord, 

and glorify your name, because you alone are holy?

All nations will come and worship before you

for your righteous acts have been revealed.”

15:5 After these things I looked, and the temple (the tent of the testimony) was opened in heaven, 15:6 and the seven angels who had the seven plagues came out of the temple, dressed in clean bright linen, wearing wide golden belts around their chests. 15:7 Then one of the four living creatures gave the seven angels seven golden bowls filled with the wrath of God who lives forever and ever, 15:8 and the temple was filled with smoke from God’s glory and from his power. Thus no one could enter the temple until the seven plagues from the seven angels were completed.

Revelation
Chapter 16

The Bowls of God’s Wrath

16:1 Then I heard a loud voice from the temple declaring to the seven angels: “Go and pour out on the earth the seven bowls containing God’s wrath.” 16:2 So the first angel went and poured out his bowl on the earth. Then ugly and painful sores appeared on the people who had the mark of the beast and who worshiped his image. 

16:3 Next, the second angel poured out his bowl on the sea and it turned into blood, like that of a corpse, and every living creature that was in the sea died.

16:4 Then the third angel poured out his bowl on the rivers and the springs of water, and they turned into blood. 16:5 Now I heard the angel of the waters saying:

“You are just – the one who is and who was,

the Holy One – because you have passed these judgments,

16:6 because they poured out the blood of your saints and prophets,

so you have given them blood to drink. They got what they deserved!”

16:7 Then I heard the altar reply, “Yes, Lord God, the All-Powerful, your judgments are true and just!”

16:8 Then the fourth angel poured out his bowl on the sun, and it was permitted to scorch people with fire. 16:9 Thus people were scorched by the terrible heat, yet they blasphemed the name of God, who has ruling authority over these plagues, and they would not repent and give him glory.

16:10 Then the fifth angel poured out his bowl on the throne of the beast so that darkness covered his kingdom, and people began to bite their tongues because of their pain. 16:11 They blasphemed the God of heaven because of their sufferings and because of their sores, but nevertheless they still refused to repent of their deeds. 

16:12 Then the sixth angel poured out his bowl on the great river Euphrates and dried up its water to prepare the way for the kings from the east. 16:13 Then I saw three unclean spirits that looked like frogs coming out of the mouth of the dragon, out of the mouth of the beast, and out of the mouth of the false prophet. 16:14 For they are the spirits of the demons performing signs who go out to the kings of the earth to bring them together for the battle that will take place on the great day of God, the All-Powerful. 

16:15 (Look! I will come like a thief!

Blessed is the one who stays alert and does not lose his clothes so that he will not have to walk around naked and his shameful condition be seen.)

16:16 Now the spirits gathered the kings and their armies to the place that is called Armageddon in Hebrew.

16:17 Finally the seventh angel poured out his bowl into the air and a loud voice came out of the temple from the throne, saying: “It is done!” 16:18 Then there were flashes of lightning, roaring, and crashes of thunder, and there was a tremendous earthquake – an earthquake unequaled since humanity has been on the earth, so tremendous was that earthquake. 16:19 The great city was split into three parts and the cities of the nations collapsed. So Babylon the great was remembered before God, and was given the cup filled with the wine made of God’s furious wrath. 16:20 Every island fled away and no mountains could be found. 16:21 And gigantic hailstones, weighing about a hundred pounds each, fell from heaven on people, but they blasphemed God because of the plague of hail, since it was so horrendous.

Revelation
Chapter 17

The Great Prostitute and the Beast

17:1 Then one of the seven angels who had the seven bowls came and spoke to me. “Come,” he said, “I will show you the condemnation and punishment of the great prostitute who sits on many waters, 17:2 with whom the kings of the earth committed sexual immorality and the earth’s inhabitants got drunk with the wine of her immorality.” 17:3 So he carried me away in the Spirit to a wilderness, and there I saw a woman sitting on a scarlet beast that was full of blasphemous names and had seven heads and ten horns. 17:4 Now the woman was dressed in purple and scarlet clothing, and adorned with gold, precious stones, and pearls. She held in her hand a golden cup filled with detestable things and unclean things from her sexual immorality. 17:5 On her forehead was written a name, a mystery: “Babylon the Great, the Mother of prostitutes and of the detestable things of the earth.” 17:6 I saw that the woman was drunk with the blood of the saints and the blood of those who testified to Jesus. I was greatly astounded when I saw her. 17:7 But the angel said to me, “Why are you astounded? I will interpret for you the mystery of the woman and of the beast with the seven heads and ten horns that carries her. 17:8 The beast you saw was, and is not, but is about to come up from the abyss and then go to destruction. The inhabitants of the earth – all those whose names have not been written in the book of life since the foundation of the world – will be astounded when they see that the beast was, and is not, but is to come. 17:9 (This requires a mind that has wisdom.) The seven heads are seven mountains the woman sits on. They are also seven kings: 17:10 five have fallen; one is, and the other has not yet come, but whenever he does come, he must remain for only a brief time. 17:11 The beast that was, and is not, is himself an eighth king and yet is one of the seven, and is going to destruction. 17:12 The ten horns that you saw are ten kings who have not yet received a kingdom, but will receive ruling authority as kings with the beast for one hour. 17:13 These kings have a single intent, and they will give their power and authority to the beast. 17:14 They will make war with the Lamb, but the Lamb will conquer them, because he is Lord of lords and King of kings, and those accompanying the Lamb are the called, chosen, and faithful.” 

17:15 Then the angel said to me, “The waters you saw (where the prostitute is seated) are peoples, multitudes, nations, and languages. 17:16 The ten horns that you saw, and the beast – these will hate the prostitute and make her desolate and naked. They will consume her flesh and burn her up with fire. 17:17 For God has put into their minds to carry out his purpose by making a decision to give their royal power to the beast until the words of God are fulfilled. 17:18 As for the woman you saw, she is the great city that has sovereignty over the kings of the earth.”

Revelation
Chapter 18

Babylon is Destroyed

18:1 After these things I saw another angel, who possessed great authority, coming down out of heaven, and the earth was lit up by his radiance. 18:2 He shouted with a powerful voice:

“Fallen, fallen, is Babylon the great!

She has become a lair for demons,

a haunt for every unclean spirit,

a haunt for every unclean bird,

a haunt for every unclean and detested beast.

18:3 For all the nations have fallen from 

the wine of her immoral passion,

and the kings of the earth have committed sexual immorality with her,

and the merchants of the earth have gotten rich from the power of her sensual behavior.”

18:4 Then I heard another voice from heaven saying, “Come out of her, my people, so you will not take part in her sins and so you will not receive her plagues, 18:5 because her sins have piled up all the way to heaven and God has remembered her crimes. 18:6 Repay her the same way she repaid others; pay her back double corresponding to her deeds. In the cup she mixed, mix double the amount for her. 18:7 As much as she exalted herself and lived in sensual luxury, to this extent give her torment and grief because she said to herself, ‘I rule as queen and am no widow; I will never experience grief!’ 18:8 For this reason, she will experience her plagues in a single day: disease, mourning, and famine, and she will be burned down with fire, because the Lord God who judges her is powerful!”

18:9 Then the kings of the earth who committed immoral acts with her and lived in sensual luxury with her will weep and wail for her when they see the smoke from the fire that burns her up. 18:10 They will stand a long way off because they are afraid of her torment, and will say,

“Woe, woe, O great city,

Babylon the powerful city!

For in a single hour your doom has come!”

18:11 Then the merchants of the earth will weep and mourn for her because no one buys their cargo any longer – 18:12 cargo such as gold, silver, precious stones, pearls, fine linen, purple cloth, silk, scarlet cloth, all sorts of things made of citron wood, all sorts of objects made of ivory, all sorts of things made of expensive wood, bronze, iron and marble, 18:13 cinnamon, spice, incense, perfumed ointment, frankincense, wine, olive oil and costly flour, wheat, cattle and sheep, horses and four-wheeled carriages, slaves and human lives.

18:14 (The ripe fruit you greatly desired

has gone from you,

and all your luxury and splendor

have gone from you – 

they will never ever be found again!)

18:15 The merchants who sold these things, who got rich from her, will stand a long way off because they are afraid of her torment. They will weep and mourn, 18:16 saying, 

“Woe, woe, O great city – 

dressed in fine linen, purple and scarlet clothing,

and adorned with gold, precious stones, and pearls – 

18:17 because in a single hour such great wealth has been destroyed!”

And every ship’s captain, and all who sail along the coast – seamen, and all who make their living from the sea, stood a long way off 18:18 and began to shout when they saw the smoke from the fire that burned her up, “Who is like the great city?” 18:19 And they threw dust on their heads and were shouting with weeping and mourning, 

“Woe, Woe, O great city – 

in which all those who had ships on the sea got rich from her wealth – 

because in a single hour she has been destroyed!”

18:20 (Rejoice over her, O heaven, 

and you saints and apostles and prophets,

for God has pronounced judgment against her on your behalf!)

18:21 Then one powerful angel picked up a stone like a huge millstone, threw it into the sea, and said,

“With this kind of sudden violent force 

Babylon the great city will be thrown down

and it will never be found again!

18:22 And the sound of the harpists, musicians, 

flute players, and trumpeters 

will never be heard in you again.

No craftsman who practices any trade 

will ever be found in you again;

the noise of a mill will never be heard in you again.

18:23 Even the light from a lamp

will never shine in you again!

The voices of the bridegroom and his bride 

will never be heard in you again. 

For your merchants were the tycoons of the world,

because all the nations were deceived by your magic spells!

18:24 The blood of the saints and prophets was found in her, 

along with the blood of all those who had been killed on the earth.”

Revelation
Chapter 19

19:1 After these things I heard what sounded like the loud voice of a vast throng in heaven, saying,

“Hallelujah! Salvation and glory and power belong to our God, 

19:2 because his judgments are true and just.

For he has judged the great prostitute

who corrupted the earth with her sexual immorality,

and has avenged the blood of his servants poured out by her own hands!”

19:3 Then a second time the crowd shouted, “Hallelujah!” The smoke rises from her forever and ever. 19:4 The twenty-four elders and the four living creatures threw themselves to the ground and worshiped God, who was seated on the throne, saying: “Amen! Hallelujah!”

19:5 Then a voice came from the throne, saying: 

“Praise our God

all you his servants,

and all you who fear Him,

both the small and the great!”

The Wedding Celebration of the Lamb

19:6 Then I heard what sounded like the voice of a vast throng, like the roar of many waters and like loud crashes of thunder. They were shouting:

“Hallelujah! 

For the Lord our God, the All-Powerful, reigns!

19:7 Let us rejoice and exult

and give him glory,

because the wedding celebration of the Lamb has come,

and his bride has made herself ready.

19:8 She was permitted to be dressed in bright, clean, fine linen” (for the fine linen is the righteous deeds of the saints).

19:9 Then the angel said to me, “Write the following: Blessed are those who are invited to the banquet at the wedding celebration of the Lamb!” He also said to me, “These are the true words of God.” 19:10 So I threw myself down at his feet to worship him, but he said, “Do not do this! I am only a fellow servant with you and your brothers who hold to the testimony about Jesus. Worship God, for the testimony about Jesus is the spirit of prophecy.”

The Son of God Goes to War

19:11 Then I saw heaven opened and here came a white horse! The one riding it was called “Faithful” and “True,” and with justice he judges and goes to war. 19:12 His eyes are like a fiery flame and there are many diadem crowns on his head. He has a name written that no one knows except himself. 19:13 He is dressed in clothing dipped in blood, and he is called the Word of God. 19:14 The armies that are in heaven, dressed in white, clean, fine linen, were following him on white horses. 19:15 From his mouth extends a sharp sword, so that with it he can strike the nations. He will rule them with an iron rod, and he stomps the winepress of the furious wrath of God, the All-Powerful. 19:16 He has a name written on his clothing and on his thigh: “King of kings and Lord of lords.”

19:17 Then I saw one angel standing in the sun, and he shouted in a loud voice to all the birds flying high in the sky:

“Come, gather around for the great banquet of God,

19:18 to eat your fill of the flesh of kings, 

the flesh of generals, 

the flesh of powerful people, 

the flesh of horses and those who ride them, 

and the flesh of all people, both free and slave, 

and small and great!”

19:19 Then I saw the beast and the kings of the earth and their armies assembled to do battle with the one who rode the horse and with his army. 19:20 Now the beast was seized, and along with him the false prophet who had performed the signs on his behalf – signs by which he deceived those who had received the mark of the beast and those who worshiped his image. Both of them were thrown alive into the lake of fire burning with sulfur. 19:21 The others were killed by the sword that extended from the mouth of the one who rode the horse, and all the birds gorged themselves with their flesh.

Revelation
Chapter 20

The Thousand Year Reign

20:1 Then I saw an angel descending from heaven, holding in his hand the key to the abyss and a huge chain. 20:2 He seized the dragon – the ancient serpent, who is the devil and Satan – and tied him up for a thousand years. 20:3 The angel then threw him into the abyss and locked and sealed it so that he could not deceive the nations until the one thousand years were finished. (After these things he must be released for a brief period of time.)

20:4 Then I saw thrones and seated on them were those who had been given authority to judge. I also saw the souls of those who had been beheaded because of the testimony about Jesus and because of the word of God. These had not worshiped the beast or his image and had refused to receive his mark on their forehead or hand. They came to life and reigned with Christ for a thousand years. 20:5 (The rest of the dead did not come to life until the thousand years were finished.) This is the first resurrection. 20:6 Blessed and holy is the one who takes part in the first resurrection. The second death has no power over them, but they will be priests of God and of Christ, and they will reign with him for a thousand years.

Satan’s Final Defeat

20:7 Now when the thousand years are finished, Satan will be released from his prison 20:8 and will go out to deceive the nations at the four corners of the earth, Gog and Magog, to bring them together for the battle. They are as numerous as the grains of sand in the sea. 20:9 They went up on the broad plain of the earth and encircled the camp of the saints and the beloved city, but fire came down from heaven and devoured them completely. 20:10 And the devil who deceived them was thrown into the lake of fire and sulfur, where the beast and the false prophet are too, and they will be tormented there day and night forever and ever.

The Great White Throne

20:11 Then I saw a large white throne and the one who was seated on it; the earth and the heaven fled from his presence, and no place was found for them. 20:12 And I saw the dead, the great and the small, standing before the throne. Then books were opened, and another book was opened – the book of life. So the dead were judged by what was written in the books, according to their deeds. 20:13 The sea gave up the dead that were in it, and Death and Hades gave up the dead that were in them, and each one was judged according to his deeds. 20:14 Then Death and Hades were thrown into the lake of fire. This is the second death – the lake of fire. 20:15 If anyone’s name was not found written in the book of life, that person was thrown into the lake of fire.

Revelation
Chapter 21

A New Heaven and a New Earth

21:1 Then I saw a new heaven and a new earth, for the first heaven and earth had ceased to exist, and the sea existed no more. 21:2 And I saw the holy city – the new Jerusalem – descending out of heaven from God, made ready like a bride adorned for her husband. 21:3 And I heard a loud voice from the throne saying: “Look! The residence of God is among human beings. He will live among them, and they will be his people, and God himself will be with them. 21:4 He will wipe away every tear from their eyes, and death will not exist any more – or mourning, or crying, or pain, for the former things have ceased to exist.”

21:5 And the one seated on the throne said: “Look! I am making all things new!” Then he said to me, “Write it down, because these words are reliable and true.” 21:6 He also said to me, “It is done! I am the Alpha and the Omega, the beginning and the end. To the one who is thirsty I will give water free of charge from the spring of the water of life. 21:7 The one who conquers will inherit these things, and I will be his God and he will be my son. 21:8 But to the cowards, unbelievers, detestable persons, murderers, the sexually immoral, and those who practice magic spells, idol worshipers, and all those who lie, their place will be in the lake that burns with fire and sulfur. That is the second death.”

The New Jerusalem Descends

21:9 Then one of the seven angels who had the seven bowls full of the seven final plagues came and spoke to me, saying, “Come, I will show you the bride, the wife of the Lamb!” 21:10 So he took me away in the Spirit to a huge, majestic mountain and showed me the holy city, Jerusalem, descending out of heaven from God. 21:11 The city possesses the glory of God; its brilliance is like a precious jewel, like a stone of crystal-clear jasper. 21:12 It has a massive, high wall with twelve gates, with twelve angels at the gates, and the names of the twelve tribes of the nation of Israel are written on the gates. 21:13 There are three gates on the east side, three gates on the north side, three gates on the south side and three gates on the west side. 21:14 The wall of the city has twelve foundations, and on them are the twelve names of the twelve apostles of the Lamb.

21:15 The angel who spoke to me had a golden measuring rod with which to measure the city and its foundation stones and wall. 21:16 Now the city is laid out as a square, its length and width the same. He measured the city with the measuring rod at fourteen hundred miles (its length and width and height are equal). 21:17 He also measured its wall, one hundred forty-four cubits according to human measurement, which is also the angel’s. 21:18 The city’s wall is made of jasper and the city is pure gold, like transparent glass. 21:19 The foundations of the city’s wall are decorated with every kind of precious stone. The first foundation is jasper, the second sapphire, the third agate, the fourth emerald, 21:20 the fifth onyx, the sixth carnelian, the seventh chrysolite, the eighth beryl, the ninth topaz, the tenth chrysoprase, the eleventh jacinth, and the twelfth amethyst. 21:21 And the twelve gates are twelve pearls – each one of the gates is made from just one pearl! The main street of the city is pure gold, like transparent glass.

21:22 Now I saw no temple in the city, because the Lord God – the All-Powerful – and the Lamb are its temple. 21:23 The city does not need the sun or the moon to shine on it, because the glory of God lights it up, and its lamp is the Lamb. 21:24 The nations will walk by its light and the kings of the earth will bring their grandeur into it. 21:25 Its gates will never be closed during the day (and there will be no night there). 21:26 They will bring the grandeur and the wealth of the nations into it, 21:27 but nothing ritually unclean will ever enter into it, nor anyone who does what is detestable or practices falsehood, but only those whose names are written in the Lamb’s book of life. 

Revelation
Chapter 22

22:1 Then the angel showed me the river of the water of life – water as clear as crystal – pouring out from the throne of God and of the Lamb, 22:2 flowing down the middle of the city’s main street. On each side of the river is the tree of life producing twelve kinds of fruit, yielding its fruit every month of the year. Its leaves are for the healing of the nations. 22:3 And there will no longer be any curse, and the throne of God and the Lamb will be in the city. His servants will worship him, 22:4 and they will see his face, and his name will be on their foreheads. 22:5 Night will be no more, and they will not need the light of a lamp or the light of the sun, because the Lord God will shine on them, and they will reign forever and ever.

A Final Reminder

22:6 Then the angel said to me, “These words are reliable and true. The Lord, the God of the spirits of the prophets, has sent his angel to show his servants what must happen soon.”

22:7 (Look! I am coming soon!

Blessed is the one who keeps the words of the prophecy expressed in this book.)

22:8 I, John, am the one who heard and saw these things, and when I heard and saw them, I threw myself down to worship at the feet of the angel who was showing them to me. 22:9 But he said to me, “Do not do this! I am a fellow servant with you and with your brothers the prophets, and with those who obey the words of this book. Worship God!” 22:10 Then he said to me, “Do not seal up the words of the prophecy contained in this book, because the time is near. 22:11 The evildoer must continue to do evil, and the one who is morally filthy must continue to be filthy. The one who is righteous must continue to act righteously, and the one who is holy must continue to be holy.”

22:12 (Look! I am coming soon, 

and my reward is with me to pay each one according to what he has done!

22:13 I am the Alpha and the Omega, 

the first and the last, 

the beginning and the end!)

22:14 Blessed are those who wash their robes so they can have access to the tree of life and can enter into the city by the gates. 22:15 Outside are the dogs and the sorcerers and the sexually immoral, and the murderers, and the idolaters and everyone who loves and practices falsehood! 

22:16 “I, Jesus, have sent my angel to testify to you about these things for the churches. I am the root and the descendant of David, the bright morning star!” 22:17 And the Spirit and the bride say, “Come!” And let the one who hears say: “Come!” And let the one who is thirsty come; let the one who wants it take the water of life free of charge.

22:18 I testify to the one who hears the words of the prophecy contained in this book: If anyone adds to them, God will add to him the plagues described in this book. 22:19 And if anyone takes away from the words of this book of prophecy, God will take away his share in the tree of life and in the holy city that are described in this book.

22:20 The one who testifies to these things says, “Yes, I am coming soon!” Amen! Come, Lord Jesus! 22:21 The grace of the Lord Jesus be with all.

NET Bible Principles of Translation

1. Text

Old Testament: For the OT the translators started with the MT (Masoretic Text) found in the current edition of BHS (Biblia Hebraica Stuttgartensia). In particularly difficult passages the translator may have followed a variant reading found in the versions, alternative Hebrew tradition (e.g., DSS), or in some cases, conjectural emendation. Such variations from the MT were noted by the individual translator and reviewed by the OT textual consultant. New Testament: For the NT the Greek text to be used by individual translators was decided by the textual consultant. The full Greek text will be published at a later date. Traditional passages: For passages which lack adequate textual authority (i.e., are almost certainly not part of the autographs) the words were included in the translation in double square brackets with a note giving a brief discussion of the problem. 2. Interpretive Decisions and Tools 

Interpretive decisions, where necessary to translate a passage, were made by the translators and editors. The alternative renderings, where exegetically significant, have been indicated in the notes. Standard technical (critical) commentaries and relevant periodical articles were consulted in the translation process. These are often cited in the notes. Current standard lexical tools were consulted as needed. For the OT, these included such works as BDB, KB3, and TDOT; for the NT, BDAG, Louw-Nida, and TDNT. Computerized concordance programs and electronic search engines were used extensively in the production of this translation. 3. Form of Translation

No translation can ever achieve complete formal equivalence. Even a translation which sometimes reflects Hebrew and Greek word order at the expense of English style has to resort to paraphrase in some places. On the other hand, no translation achieves complete dynamic equivalence either. Thus this translation, like every other, ends up somewhere between the two extremes. These considerations are reflected by the following specific qualifications:

In vocabulary and grammatical forms every attempt has been made to reflect the different styles of the different authors of the Bible. Paul’s letters should not sound like John’s or Peter’s or that of Hebrews in the English translation where possible. The level of English style is formal (not, however, technical) except in passages where somewhat more informal style would be more in keeping with the content. In general the use of contractions (“don’t,” “isn’t”) has been avoided, except in quoted speech. The language of average adults had priority. The translation attempts to use good literary style but is not overly formal or embellished. The translation is intended to be understandable to non-Christians as well as Christians, so liturgical language or Christian “jargon” has been avoided. Archaisms have also been avoided (e.g., “letter” was used instead of “epistle” in the NT). This includes the absolute avoidance of “thou” and “thee,” since there were no distinctions in the original Hebrew or Greek between pronouns used to address people and those used to address Deity. On a related note, pronouns which refer to Deity are not capitalized for this same reason. Long, complicated sentences in the original languages have been broken up into shorter sentences more acceptable in contemporary English. However, an attempt has been made to maintain the connections present in the original languages wherever possible. Idiomatic expressions and figurative language in the original languages have been changed when they make no sense to a typical modern English reader or are likely to lead to misunderstanding by a typical modern English reader. The literal reading has been placed in a note giving a brief explanation (a translator’s note). Nouns have been used for pronouns where the English pronoun would be obscure or ambiguous to a modern reader. This has been indicated in a note. Questions expecting a negative answer have been phrased to indicate this to the English reader. Clearly redundant expressions such as “answered and said” have been avoided unless they have special rhetorical force in context. The literal reading is frequently indicated in a note. Introductory expressions like “verily, verily” have been translated idiomatically, the single ἀμήν as “I tell you the truth” and the double ἀμήν (peculiar to John’s Gospel) as “I tell you the solemn truth.” Introductory particles like ἰδού (“behold”) have been translated to fit the context (sometimes “listen,” “pay attention,” “look,” or occasionally left untranslated). Use of quotation marks (which did not exist in the original Hebrew and Greek manuscripts) conforms to contemporary American English usage. The basic unit of translation is the paragraph. Verse numbers are included in boldface type. Poetry is set out as poetry. Greek historical presents have been translated by English simple past tenses since English has no corresponding use of the present tense. In places where passive constructions create ambiguity, obscurity, or awkwardness in contemporary English, either the agent has been specified from context or the construction has been changed to active voice in the English translation, with an explanatory note. Ellipses have been filled out according to current English requirements (e.g., 1 John 2:19). This is normally explained in a note. Proper names have been standardized in accordance with accepted English usage. 4. Additional Features of the Translation and Notes

Any place supplementary information is required (e.g., word-plays, historical details, cultural differences, etc.) this is provided in a brief study note. Any technical terms (corban, Mark 7:11) used in the translation are explained in a study note. Any unfamiliar terms for weights, measures, and coins have been explained in a study note, although in general these have been expressed in contemporary American units, with metric units given parenthetically in the notes. A limited system of cross-referencing to principal parallel texts, cross-references, or significant allusions is found in the notes. Descriptive section headings have been provided by the translators and editors as an aid to the reader. Greek and Hebrew in the translator’s notes use Greek and Hebrew fonts, often followed by transliteration. The occasional reference to a Greek or Hebrew word in a study note is transliterated. Abbreviations of biblical books and reference material follow Patrick H. Alexander et al., eds., The SBL Handbook of Style: For Ancient Near Eastern, Biblical, and Early Christian Studies (Peabody, Mass.: Hendrickson, 1999) with only a few exceptions. Abbreviations for Biblical Books 
and Nonbiblical Literature

Old Testament

Gen

Genesis

Exod

Exodus

Lev

Leviticus

Num

Numbers

Deut

Deuteronomy

Josh

Joshua

Judg

Judges

Ruth

Ruth

1 Sam

1 Samuel

2 Sam

2 Samuel

1 Kgs

1 Kings

2 Kgs

2 Kings

1 Chr

1 Chronicles

2 Chr

2 Chronicles

Ezra

Ezra

Neh

Nehemiah

Esth

Esther

Job

Job

Ps(s)

Psalms

Prov

Proverbs

Eccl

Ecclesiastes

Song

Song of Songs

Isa

Isaiah

Jer

Jeremiah

Lam

Lamentations

Ezek

Ezekiel

Dan

Daniel

Hos

Hosea 

Joel

Joel

Amos

Amos

Obad

Obadiah

Jonah

Jonah

Mic

Micah

Nah

Nahum

Hab

Habakkuk

Zeph

Zephaniah

Hag

Haggai

Zech

Zechariah

Mal

Malachi

Books of the Old Testament Apocrypha

Bar

Baruch

Add Dan

Additions to Daniel

Pr Azar

Prayer of Azariah

Bel

Bel and the Dragon

Sg Three

Song of the Three Young Men

Sus

Susanna

1-2 Esd

1-2 Esdras

Add Esth

Additions to Esther

Ep Jer

Epistle of Jeremiah

Jdt

Judith

1-4 Macc

1-4 Maccabees

Pr Man

Prayer of Manasseh

Ps 151

Psalm 151

Sir

Sirach/ Ecclesiasticus

Tob

Tobit

Wis

Wisdom of Solomon

New Testament

Matt

Matthew

Mark

Mark

Luke

Luke

John

John

Acts

Acts

Rom

Romans

1 Cor

1 Corinthians

2 Cor

2 Corinthians

Gal

Galatians

Eph

Ephesians

Phil

Philippians

Col

Colossians

1 Thess

1 Thessalonians

2 Thess

2 Thessalonians

1 Tim

1 Timothy

2 Tim

2 Timothy

Titus

Titus

Phlm

Philemon

Heb

Hebrews

Jas

James

1 Pet

1 Peter

2 Pet 

2 Peter

1 John

1 John

2 John

2 John

3 John

3 John

Jude

Jude

Rev

Revelation

Other Ancient Documents

Two citation systems for Philo and Josephus are used in the notes. The older (classical) system is listed first, and the Loeb citation system then follows in parentheses.

1 En.

1 Enoch, a Jewish pseudepigraphic work that includes what are thought to be Christian interpolations in chaps. 37-71 (also called Ethiopic Enoch)

1 Kgdms

1 Kingdoms, the book of the LXX which corresponds to 1 Samuel

1QH

Thanksgiving Hymns, hymns composed for worship within the Qumran community

1QS

Rule of the Community, one of the first Dead Sea Scrolls recovered. This scroll details rules for admission into the Qumran community.

2 Bar.

2 Baruch, a Jewish apocalyptic work written early in the second century

2 En.

2 Enoch, an Jewish pseudepigraphic work that expands upon Gen 5:21-32

4QMMT

Miqsat Maʿaseh Torah from Qumran Cave 4, one of the Dead Sea Scrolls

Ag. Ap.

Against Apion, a defense of the Jewish people written by Josephus, a Jewish historian who lived from a.d. 37/38 until the early years of the second century.

Ant.

Jewish Antiquities, a history of the Jewish people written by Josephus (see Ag. Ap. above) 

b.

Indicates a tractate from the Babylonian Talmud, which contains the Mishnah and rabbinic interpretive expansions. Collected ca. a.d. 500-550.

CD

A copy of the Damascus Document, which is one of the Dead Sea Scrolls, found in the Cairo genizah

Embassy

On the Embassy to Gaius, a philosophical work by Philo, a Jewish philosopher who lived from 20 b.c. to a.d. 50 

Praep. Ev.

Praeparatio evangelica (Preparation for the Gospel), a work by Eusebius, bishop of Caesarea in Palestine, who lived ca. a.d. 260-341

Flaccus

Against Flaccus, a philosophical work by Philo (see Embassy above)

Heir

Who is the Heir?, a philosophical work by Philo (see Embassy above)

Herm.

Shepherd of Hermas, a Christian work written in Rome sometime during the 1st and 2nd centuries a.d.

Ibn Ezra

Rabbi Abraham Ibn Ezra, a medieval Jewish scholar who wrote many works, including a commentary on the Hebrew Bible. Lived a.d. 1092/1093 to a.d.1167.

Ign.

Ignatius, Bishop of Antioch, who died as a martyr in Rome early in the second century. Following will be the abbreviation for one of his seven letters.

J. W.

Jewish War, a history of the events surrounding the war between Rome and the Jews ca. a.d. 70 written by Josephus (see Ag. Ap. above)

Jub.

Jubilees, a Jewish pseudepigraphic work that expands upon the narratives in Genesis and Exodus

Letter of Aristeas

An ancient letter which purports to explain the origins of the LXX. Posited by most scholars to have been written ca. 170 b.c.

Life

The Life, an autobiography of Josephus (see Ag. Ap. above)

m.

Indicates a tractate from the Mishnah, a codification of Jewish rabbinic oral tradition collected ca. a.d. 200-220 

Pirqe Avot

A collection of the sayings from Jewish sages and rabbis

Pirqe Rabbi Eliezer

A collection of Jewish rabbinic tradition compiled ca. a.d. 750-850

Posterity

On the Posterity of Cain, a philosophical work by Philo (see Embassy above)

Rabbah

Jewish rabbinic commentary on books of the Bible, e.g., Genesis Rabbah

Sib. Or.

Sibylline Oracles, a collection of poetic prophecies contained within the Jewish pseudepigrapha

Sifre Deut

Sifre on Deuteronomy, a collection of rabbinic interpretations on the book of Deuteronomy compiled ca. a.d. 350-400

Smr

Samaritan Pentateuch, the version of the first five books of the Old Testament accepted as canonical by the Samaritans

t.

Indicates a tractate from the Tosefta, a codification of Jewish rabbinic oral tradition collected ca. a.d. 220-230 

T. Gad

Testament of Gad, one of the Testaments of the Twelve Patriarchs, a group of works written between 109 and 106 b.c. and inspired by Jacob’s testament in Gen 49

T. Reu.

Testament of Reuben, one of the Testaments of the Twelve Patriarchs (see T. Gad above) 

T. Sol.

Testament of Solomon, a story about Solomon building the Temple, written sometime during the 1st to 3rd centuries a.d.

Tg.

Indicates a Targum, an Aramaic translation of the Hebrew Bible which often included interpretive comments

Tg. Onq.

Targum Onqelos, an Aramaic translation of the Pentateuch, regarded as the official targum of these books

Tg. Ps.-J.

Targum Pseudo-Jonathan, an Aramaic translation of the Pentateuch

y.

Indicates a tractate from the Jerusalem Talmud (which actually took shape in Galilee ca. a.d. 400-425), a work which contains the Mishnah and rabbinic interpretive expansions

Abbreviations for Bible Versions

English Versions 

NET

The NET Bible / New English Translation (NT, 1998; First Beta Edition, 2001; Second Beta Edition, 2003; First Edition, 2005)

TNIV

Today’s New International Version (NT, 2001)

NLT

New Living Translation (1996)

CEV

The Contemporary English Version (1995)

NIrV

New International Reader’s Version (1995)

Message

E. H. Peterson, The Message: The New Testament in Contemporary Language (1993)

NCV

New Century Version (1991)

REB 

Revised English Bible (1989)

NRSV 

New Revised Standard Version (1989)

NJB

New Jerusalem Bible (1985)

NJPS

Tanakh (1985), produced by the Jewish Publication Society

NKJV

New King James Version (1979)

TEV

Today’s English Version, also known as Good News for Modern Man (1976)

NIV

The New International Version (NT, 1973; OT, 1978)

LB

The Living Bible (1971)

NASB

New American Standard Bible (1971; update 1995)

NAB

The New American Bible (1970)

NEB 

The New English Bible (1970)

JB

Jerusalem Bible (1966)

Amplified

The Amplified Bible (1965)

BBE

C. K. Ogden, The Bible in Basic English (1965)

JPS

The Torah (1962), The Prophets (Nevi’im) (1978), The Writings (Kethuvim) (1982), produced by the Jewish Publication Society

MLB

Modern Language Bible: New Berkeley Version (1959; rev. 1969)

Phillips

J. B. Phillips, The New Testament in Modern English (1958)

RSV

Revised Standard Version (NT, 1946; OT, 1952)

Knox

R. A. Knox, The New Testament in English (1945)

AT

The Bible—An American Translation (1927)

Moffatt

James Moffatt, A New Translation of the Bible (1926)

TCNT

The Twentieth Century New Testament (1898-1901; rev. 1904)

ASV

American Standard Version (1901)

RV

Revised Version (NT 1881; OT 1885)

YLT

Young's Literal Translation (1862; rev. 1898)

KJV (=AV)

The King James Version, known in Britain as the Authorized Version (1611)

AV (=KJV)

The Authorized Version, known in America as the King James Version (1611)

Douay

Douay-Rheims Version, a translation for the Roman Catholic Church (NT 1582; OT 1609-1610)

Ancient Versions

MT

Masoretic Text (the traditional rabbinical text of the Hebrew Bible, dating from the medieval period)

LXX

Septuagint (the Greek Old Testament, translated between 250-100 b.c.)

General Abbreviations

NET Bible Footnote Types 

tn

Translator’s Note—explains the rationale for the translation and gives alternative translations, interpretive options, and other technical information.

sn

Study Note—includes comments about historical or cultural background, explanation of obscure phrases or brief discussions of context, discussions of the theological point made by the biblical author, cross references and references to Old Testament quotations or allusions in the New Testament, or other miscellaneous information helpful to the modern reader.

tc

Text-critical Note—discusses alternate (variant) readings found in the various manuscripts and groups of manuscripts of the Hebrew Old Testament and Greek New Testament.

map

Map Note—gives map coordinates for site within the two map sections, “The Journeys of Paul” and “The Holy Land from the Heavens.”

Journals

ABR

Australian Biblical Review

ADAJ

Annual of the Department of Antiquities of Jordan

AION

Annali dell’Istituto Orientale di Napoli

AJBA

Australian Journal of Biblical Archaeology

AJSL

American Journal of Semitic Languages and Literature

ArOr

Archiv Orientální

ASTI

Annual of the Swedish Thelogical Institute

AUSS

Andrews University Seminary Studies

BA

Biblical Archaeologist

BAR

Biblical Archaeology Review

BASOR

Bulletin of the American Schools of Oriental Research

BBR

Bulletin for Biblical Research

BETS

Bulletin of the Evangelical Theological Society

Bib

Biblica

BiBh

Bible Bhashyam

Bijdr

Bijdragen: Tijdschrift voor filosofie en theologie

BJRL

Bulletin of the John Rylands University Library of Manchester

BN 

Biblische Notizen

BRev

Bible Review

BSac

Bibliotheca Sacra

BT

The Bible Translator

BTB

Biblical Theology Bulletin

BV

Biblical Viewpoint

BZ

Biblische Zeitschrift

CBQ

Catholic Biblical Quarterly

CentBib

Central Bible Quarterly

CTJ

Calvin Theological Journal

CTM

Concordia Theological Monthly

CTR

Criswell Theological Review

ErIsr

Eretz-Israel

EvQ

Evangelical Quarterly

ExpTim

Expository Times

FO

Folia orientalia

GOT

Glasgow Oriental Transactions

GTJ

Grace Theological Journal

HAR

Hebrew Annual Review

HBT

Horizons in Biblical Theology

HS

Hebrew Studies

HTR

Harvard Theological Review

HUCA

Hebrew Union College Annual

IEJ

Israel Exploration Journal

Int

Interpretation

JANESCU

Journal of the Ancient Near Eastern Society of Columbia University

JAOS

Journal of the American Oriental Society

JBL

Journal of Biblical Literature

JCS

Journal of Cuneiform Studies

JETS

Journal of the Evangelical Theological Society

JJP

Journal of Juristic Papyrology

JJS

Journal of Jewish Studies

JNES

Journal of Near Eastern Studies

JNSL

Journal of Northwest Semitic Languages

JPOS

Journal of the Palestine Oriental Society

JQR

Jewish Quarterly Review

JRAS

Journal of the Royal Asiatic Society

JSNT

Journal for the Study of the New Testament

JSOT

Journal for the Study of the Old Testament

JSS

Journal of Semitic Studies

JTS

Journal of Theological Studies

JTVI

Journal of the Transactions of the Victoria Institute

Jud

Judaica

Les ̌

Les ̌onénu

LTQ

Lexington Theological Quarterly

MAOG

Mitteilungen der Altorientalischen Gesellschaft

Mus

Muséon: Revue d’études orientales

NovT

Novum Testamentum

NTS

New Testament Studies

Or

Orientalia

OTS

Old Testament Studies

PEQ

Palestinian Exploration Quarterly

RA

Revue d’assyriologie et d’archéologie orientale

RB

Revue biblique

RevExp

Review and Expositor

RHPR

Revue d’histoire et de philosophie religieuses

RHR

Revue de l’histoire des religions

RQ

Römische Quartalschrift für christliche Altertumskunde und Kirchengeschichte

RSR

Recherches de science religieuse

Sem

Semitica

SJT

Scottish Journal of Theology

ST

Studia theologica

SwJT

Southwestern Journal of Theology

TA

Tel Aviv

TB

Theologische Bücherei: Neudrucke und Berichte aus dem 20. Jahrhundert

TGUOS

Transactions of the Glasgow University Oriental Society

TJ

Trinity Journal

TLZ

Theologische Literaturzeitung

TRu

Theologische Rundschau

TynBul

Tyndale Bulletin

TZ

Theologische Zeitschrift

UF

Ugarit-Forschungen

VT

Vetus Testamentum

WTJ

Westminster Theological Journal

WW

Word and World

ZÄS

Zeitschrift für ägyptische Sprache und Altertumskunde

ZAW

Zeitschrift für die alttestamentliche Wissenschaft

ZDMG

Zeitschrift der deutschen morgenländischen Gesellschaft

ZNW

Zeitschrift für die neutestamentliche Wissenschaft

Commentary and Monograph Series

AB

Anchor Bible

AfO

Archiv für Orientforschung

AGJU

Arbeiten zur Geschichte des antiken Judentums und des Urchristentums

AnBib

Analecta biblica

AnOr

Analecta orientalia

AOAT

Alter Orient und Altes Testament

ArBib

The Aramaic Bible

ATD

Das Alte Testament Deutsch

BASORSup

Bulletin of the American Schools of Oriental Research: Supplement Series

BECNT

Baker Exegetical Commentary on the New Testament

BibOr

Biblica et orientalia

BKAT

Biblischer Kommentar, Altes Testament

BSC

Bible Student’s Commentary

CBC

Cambridge Bible Commentary

CBQMS

Catholic Biblical Quarterly Monograph Series

CC

Continental Commentaries

CNT

Commentaire du Nouveau Testament

ConBOT

Coniectanea biblica: Old Testament Series

DissAb

Dissertation Abstracts

DJD

Discoveries in the Judaean Desert

DJDJ

Discoveries in the Judaean Desert of Jordan

DSBS

Daily Study Bible Series

EGGNT

Exegetical Guide to the Greek New Testament

FCI

Foundations of Contemporary Interpretation

FOTL

Forms of the Old Testament Literature

FRLANT

Forschungen zur Religion und Literatur des Alten und Neuen Testaments

GBS

Guides to Biblical Scholarship

HNTC

Harper’s New Testament Commentaries

HSM

Harvard Semitic Monographs

IBC

Interpretation: A Bible Commentary for Teaching and Preaching

ICC

International Critical Commentary

JAARSup

Journal of the American Academy of Religion: Supplement Series

JBLMS

Journal of Biblical Literature Monograph Series

JPSTC

Jerusalem Publication Society Torah Commentary

JSNTSup

Journal for the Study of the New Testament: Supplement Series

JSOTSup

Journal for the Study of the Old Testament: Supplement Series

KAT

Kommentar zum Alten Testament

LHD

The Library of History and Doctrine

MNTC

Moffatt New Testament Commentary

NAC

New American Commentary

NCBC

New Century Bible Commentary

NICNT

New International Commentary on the New Testament

NICOT

New International Commentary on the Old Testament

NIGTC

New International Greek Testament Commentary

NovTSup

Supplements to Novum Testamentum

NTL

New Testament Library

OBO

Orbis biblicus et orientalis

OBT

Overtures to Biblical Theology

OTL

Old Testament Library

OTM

Oxford Theological Monographs

PTMS

Pittsburgh Theological Monograph Series

SB

Sources bibliques

SBA

Studies in Biblical Archaeology

SBG

Studies in Biblical Greek

SBLDS

Society of Biblical Literature Dissertation Series

SBT

Studies in Biblical Theology

ScrHier

Scripta hierosolymitana

SD

Studies and Documents

SHR

Studies in the History of Religions

SJLA

Studies in Judaism in Late Antiquity

SNTSMS

Society for New Testament Studies Monograph Series

SoBB

Soncino Books of the Bible

SOTBT

Studies in Old Testament Biblical Theology

SOTSMS

Society for Old Testament Studies Monograph Series

SPCKTC

Society for Promoting Christian Knowledge Theological Collections

SSN

Studia semitica neerlandica

StPB

Studia post-biblica

SUNT

Studien zur Umwelt des Neuen Testaments

TBC

Torch Bible Commentaries

TCS

Texts from Cuneiform Sources

TOTC

Tyndale Old Testament Commentaries

TU

Texte und Untersuchungen

VAB

Vorderasiatische Bibliothek

VTSup

Supplements to Vetus Testamentum

WBC

Word Biblical Commentary

WEC

Wycliffe Exegetical Commentary

WUNT

Wissenschaftliche Untersuchungen zum Neuen Testament

Text-critical Terms

al

Abbreviation for alii, a Latin phrase meaning “others,” referring to manuscripts

ms (mss)

manuscript (manuscripts)

pc

Abbreviation for pauci, “a few (others),” referring to manuscripts

pm

Abbreviation for permulti, “a great many (others),” referring to manuscripts

vid

Abbreviation for videtur, a Latin word meaning “apparently” or “so it appears,” referring to an uncertain reading in a manuscript

Miscellaneous Abbreviations

abs.

absolute

acc.

accusative

ANE

Ancient Near East (noun), Ancient Near Eastern (adjective)

ca.

approximately (from Latin circa)

cf.

compare (from Latin confer)

chap.

chapter

dat.

dative

ed.

editor; edited by; edition

e.g.

for example (from Latin exempli gratia)

ET

English text (when versification in the English Bible differs from the Greek or Hebrew text)

expr.

expression

ff.

following

fig.

figurative; figuratively

gen.

genitive

GT

Greek text (when versification differs from the English Bible)

HT

Hebrew text (when versification differs from the English Bible)

i.e.

that is (from Latin id est)

loc. cit.

in the place cited (from Latin loco citato), usually referring to a Bible verse or passage cited in a commentary or other work

ms (mss)

manuscript (manuscripts)

nom.

nominative

NT

New Testament

pl.

plural

q.v.

which see (from Latin quod vide)

sc.

supply (from Latin scilicet)

sing.

singular

suppl.

supplement

s.v.

under the word (from Latin sub verbo or sub voce)

trans.

translated; translator

v.

verse

viz.

namely (from Latin videlicet)

w.

with

List of Cited Works 

Works Cited by Abbreviation

AHw

Soden, Wolfram von. Akkadisches Handwörterbuch. 3 vols. Wiesbaden: Harrassowitz, 1965-1981.

ANEP

Pritchard, James B., ed. The Ancient Near East in Pictures Relating to the Old Testament. Princeton: Princeton University Press, 1954.

ANET

Pritchard, James B., ed. Ancient Near Eastern Texts Relating to the Old Testament. 3d ed. Princeton: Princeton University Press, 1969.

BDAG

Bauer, W. A Greek-English Lexicon of the New Testament and Other Early Christian Literature. 3d ed. Revised and edited by F. W. Danker. Translated by W. F. Arndt, F. W. Gingrich, and F. W. Danker. Chicago and London: University of Chicago Press, 2000.

BDB

Brown, Francis, S. R. Driver, and Charles A. Briggs. The New Brown-Driver-Briggs-Gesenius Hebrew and English Lexicon. Peabody, Mass.: Hendrickson, 1979.

BDF

Blass, F. and A. Debrunner. A Greek Grammar of the New Testament and Other Early Christian Literature. Translated and edited by Robert W. Funk. Chicago: University of Chicago Press, 1961.

BHK

Kittel, R., ed. Biblia Hebraica. Stuttgart: Würtemburgische Bibelanstalt, 1905-1906, 1925, 1937, 1951, 1973.

BHS

Elliger, K. and W. Rudolph, eds. Biblia Hebraica Stuttgartensia. Stuttgart: Deutsche Bibelgesellschaft, 1983.

BKCNT

Walvoord, John F., and Roy B. Zuck, eds. The Bible Knowledge Commentary. New Testament Edition. Wheaton: Victor Books, 1983.

BKCOT

Walvoord, John F., and Roy B. Zuck, eds. The Bible Knowledge Commentary. Old Testament Edition. Wheaton: Victor Books, 1985.

BRL2

Galling, Kurt, ed. Biblisches Reallexikon. 2d ed. Handbuch Zum Alten Testament 1/1. Tübingen: Mohr Siebeck, 1977. 

CAD

Gelb, Ignace J., ed. The Assyrian Dictionary of the Oriental Institute of the University of Chicago. Chicago: University of Chicago, 1956-.

CTA

Herdner, A., ed. Corpus des tablettes en cunéiformes alphabétiques découvertes à Ras Shamra-Ugarit de 1929 à 1939. Mission de Ras Shamra 10. Paris: P. Geuthner, 1963.

DCH

Clines, D. J. A., ed. Dictionary of Classical Hebrew. Sheffield: Sheffield Academic Press, 1993-.

DISO

Jean, Charles-François, and Jacob Hoftijzer, eds. Dictionnaire des inscriptions sémitiques de l’ouest. Leiden: Brill, 1965.

DJG

Green, J. B., and S. McKnight, eds. Dictionary of Jesus and the Gospels. Downers Grove, Ill.: InterVarsity, 1992.

DNWSI

Hoftijzer, J., and K. Jongeling, eds. Dictionary of the North-West Semitic Inscriptions. 2 vols. Leiden: Brill, 1995.

DPL

Hawthorne, Gerald F., and Ralph P. Martin, eds. Dictionary of Paul and His Letters. Downers Grove, Ill.: InterVarsity, 1993.

EA

Knudtzon, J. A. Die el-Amarna-Tafeln. Vorderasiatische Bibliothek. Leipzig: J. C. Hinrichs, 1915. Reprint, Aalen: Otto Zeller, 1964. Continued in Rainey, A. F. El-Amarna Tablets, 359-379. 2d rev. ed. Alter Orient Und Altes Testament 8. Kevelaer: Butzon und Bercker, 1978.

EAEHL

M. Avi-Yonah, ed. Encyclopedia of Archaeological Excavations in the Holy Land. 4 vols. Jerusalem: Massada 1975.

EBC

Gaebelein, Frank E., ed. The Expositor’s Bible Commentary. 12 vols. Grand Rapids: Zondervan, 1976-1992.

ExSyn

Wallace, Daniel B. Greek Grammar Beyond the Basics: An Exegetical Syntax of the New Testament. Grand Rapids: Zondervan, 1996.

GKC

Kautzsch, E., ed. Gesenius’ Hebrew Grammar. Translated by A. E. Cowley. 2d ed. Oxford: Clarendon, 1910.

HALOT

Koehler, L., W. Baumgartner, and J. J. Stamm. The Hebrew and Aramaic Lexicon of the Old Testament. Translated and edited under the supervision of M. E. J. Richardson. 5 vols. Leiden: Brill, 1994-2000.

IBHS

Waltke, B. K., and M. O’Connor. An Introduction to Biblical Hebrew Syntax. Winona Lake, Ind.: Eisenbrauns, 1990.

IDB

Buttrick, George A., ed. The Interpreter’s Dictionary of the Bible. 4 vols. New York: Abingdon, 1962.

IDBSup

Crim, Keith R, ed. The Interpreter’s Dictionary of the Bible: Supplementary Volume. Nashville: Abingdon, 1976

ISBE

Bromiley, G. W., ed. International Standard Bible Encyclopedia. 4 vols. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1979-1988.

Jastrow

Jastrow, Marcus. A Dictionary of the Targumim, the Talmud Babli and Yerushalmi, and the Midrashic Literature. 2d ed. New York: G. P. Putnam, 1903.

Joüon

Joüon, Paul. A Grammar of Biblical Hebrew. Translated and revised by T. Muraoka. 1st edition with corrections. 2 vols. Subsidia biblica 14/1-2. Rome: Pontifical Biblical Institute, 1993.

K&D

Keil, C. F., and F. Delitzsch. Biblical Commentary on the Old Testament. Translated by J. Martin et al. 27 vols. Edinburgh: T&T Clark, 1857-1878.

KBL

Koehler, L., and W. Baumgartner. Lexicon in Veteris Testamenti libros. 2d ed. Leiden: Brill, 1958.

L&N

Louw, Johannes P., and Eugene Nida, eds. Greek-English Lexicon of the New Testament Based on Semantic Domains. New York, NY: United Bible Societies, 1988.

LSJ

Liddell, H. G., and R. Scott. A Greek-English Lexicon. 9th ed. Revised and augmented by H. S. Jones, with the assistance of R. McKenzie. With a revised Supplement. Oxford: Clarendon, 1996. 

MHT

Moulton, J. H. A Grammar of New Testament Greek. 4 vols. Edinburgh: T&T Clark, 1908-1976: Vol. 1 (1908) Prolegomena, by J. H. Moulton. 1st ed. (1906); 3d ed. (1908); Vol. 2 (1929): Accidence and Word Formation, by W. F. Howard; Vol. 3 (1963): Syntax, by N. Turner; Vol. 4 (1976): Style, by N. Turner.

MM

Moulton, J. H., and G. Milligan. Vocabulary of the Greek New Testament. London: Hodder and Stoughton, 1930. Repr., Peabody, Mass.: Hendrickson, 1997.

NA25

Nestle, E., and K. Aland, eds. Novum Testamentum Graece. 25th ed. Stuttgart: Württembergische Bibelanstalt, 1963.

NA26

Aland, K., M. Black, C. M. Martini, B. M. Metzger, and A. Wikgren, eds. Novum Testamentum Graece. 26th ed. Stuttgart: Deutsche Bibelgesellschaft, 1979.

NA27

Aland, B., K. Aland, J. Karavidopoulos, C. M. Martini, and B. M. Metzger, eds. Novum Testamentum Graece. 27th ed. Stuttgart: Deutsche Bibelgesellschaft, 1993.

NBD3

Wood, D. R. W., ed. New Bible Dictionary. 3d ed. Downers Grove, Ill.: InterVarsity, 1996.

NIDOTTE

VanGemeren, W. A., ed. New International Dictionary of Old Testament Theology and Exegesis. 5 vols. Grand Rapids: Zondervan, 1997.

PGL

Lampe, G. W. H., ed. Patristic Greek Lexicon. Oxford; New York: Clarendon, 1968.

TCGNT

Metzger, Bruce M. A Textual Commentary on the Greek New Testament. 2d ed. Stuttgart: Deutsche Bibelgesellschaft: 1994.

TDNT

Kittel, G. and G. Friedrich. Theological Dictionary of the New Testament. Translated by Geoffrey W. Bromiley. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1964-1976.

TDOT

Botterweck, G. Johannes and Helmer Ringgren, eds. Theological Dictionary of the Old Testament. Translated by J. T. Willis, G. W. Bromiley, and D. E. Green. 8 vols. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1974-.

THAT

Jenni, Ernst, ed., with assistance from Claus Westermann. Theologisches Handwörterbuch zum Alten Testament. 2 vols. Stuttgart: C. Kaiser, 1971-1976.

ThWAT

Botterweck, G. Johannes, and Helmer Ringgren, eds. Theologisches Wörterbuch zum Alten Testament. Stuttgart: W. Kohlhammer, 1970.

TLG

Thesaurus Linguae Graecae, a computerized database of all ancient Greek literature from Homer (8th century b.c.) to the 6th century AD.

TWOT

Harris, R. Laird, Gleason L. Archer, and Bruce K. Waltke, eds. Theological Wordbook of the Old Testament. 2 vols. Chicago: Moody, 1980.

UBS3

Aland, K., M. Black, C. M. Martini, B. M. Metzger, and A. Wikgren, eds. The Greek New Testament. 3d ed., corrected. Stuttgart: United Bible Societies, 1983.

UBS4

Aland, B., K. Aland, J. Karavidopoulos, C. M. Martini, and B. M. Metzger, eds. The Greek New Testament. 4th ed., corrected. Stuttgart: United Bible Societies, 1994.

UT

Gordon, Cyrus H. Ugaritic Textbook. Revised reprint. Analecta orientalia 38. Rome: Pontifical Biblical Institute, 1998.

WUS

Aistleitner, Joseph. Das Wörterbuch der ugaritischen Sprache. Edited by Otto Eissfeldt. 3d ed. Berlin: Akademie-Verlag, 1967.

ZPEB

Tenney, Merrill C., ed. The Zondervan Pictorial Encyclopedia of the Bible. 5 vols. Grand Rapids: Zondervan, 1976.

Works Cited by Name and Short Title

Fauna and Flora of the Bible. 2d ed. Helps for Translators. New York: United Bible Societies, 1980.

The Illustrated Family Encyclopedia of the Living Bible. Chicago: San Francisco Productions, 1967.

Aharoni, Yohanan. The Land of the Bible: A Historical Geography. Translated and edited by A. F. Rainey. 2d ed. Philadelphia: Westminster, 1979.

Aharoni, Yohanan and Michael Avi-Yonah. The Macmillan Bible Atlas. Edited by Anson F. Rainey and Ze’ev Safrai. 3d ed. New York: Macmillan, 1976.

Albright, W. F. Archaeology and the Religion of Israel. 3d ed. Baltimore: Johns Hopkins, 1953.

________. From the Stone Age to Christianity: Monotheism and the Historical Process. 2d ed. Garden City, N.Y.: Doubleday, 1957.

________. “Archaic Survivals in the Text of Canticles.” Pages 1-7 in Hebrew and Semitic Studies. Edited by D. Winton Thomas and W. D. McHardy. Oxford: Claredon, 1963.

________. Yahweh and the Gods of Canaan: A Historical Analysis of Two Contrasting Faiths. Garden City, N.Y.: Doubleday, 1968.

Aldred, Cyril. The Egyptians. Ancient Peoples and Places 18. New York: Praeger, 1961.

Allen, Leslie C. The Books of Joel, Obadiah, Jonah, and Micah. New International Commentary on the Old Testament. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1976.

________. Psalms 101-150. Word Biblical Commentary 21. Waco, Tex.: Word, 1983.

________. Ezekiel. 2 vols. Word Biblical Commentary 28-29. Dallas: Word, 1990-1994.

Alter, R. The Art of Biblical Narrative. New York: Basic Books, 1981.

Andersen, Francis I. Job. Tyndale Old Testament Commentaries. Downers Grove, Ill.: InterVarsity, 1976.

Andersen, Francis I., and David Noel Freedman. Hosea. Anchor Bible 24. New York: Doubleday, 1980.

________. Amos. Anchor Bible 24A. New York: Doubleday, 1989.

André, Gunnel. Determining the Destiny: PQD in the Old Testament. Coniectanea biblica: Old Testament Series 16. Lund: Gleerup, 1980.

Archer, G. L. The Book of Job: God’s Answer to the Problem of Understanding Suffering. Grand Rapids: Baker, 1982.

Arnold, Bill T., and John H. Choi. A Guide to Biblical Hebrew Syntax. New York: Cambridge University Press, 2003.

Aune, David E. Revelation. 3 vols. Word Biblical Commentary 52ABC. Dallas: Word, 1997-1998.

Baker, J. A. The Book of Job: Unity and Suffering. Sheffield: JSOT, 1978.

Baldwin, Joyce. “Jonah.” Pages 543-90 in The Minor Prophets. Edited by Thomas E. McComiskey. 3 vols. Grand Rapids: Baker, 1993.

Barclay, William. The Gospel of John. 2 vols. Daily Study Bible Series. Philadelphia: Westminster, 1956.

Barr, James. Biblical Words for Time. 2d ed. Studies in Biblical Theology: First Series 33. London: S.C.M., 1969.

________. Comparative Philology and the Text of the Old Testament. Rev. ed. Winona Lake, Ind.: Eisenbrauns, 1987.

Barre, M. L., and J. S. Kselman. “New Exodus, Covenant, and Restoration in Psalm 23.” Pages 97-127 in The Word of the Lord Shall Go Forth: Essays in Honor of David Noel Freedman. Edited by C. F. Meyers and M. O’Connor. Winona Lake, Ind.: Eisenbrauns, 1983.

Barrett, C. K. The Gospel According to St. John. 2d ed. Philadelphia: Westminster, 1978.

________. A Commentary on the Epistle to the Romans. Edited by Henry Chadwick. Harper’s New Testament Commentaries. San Francisco: Harper & Row, 1957. Repr., Peabody, Mass.: Hendrickson, 1987.

________. A Critical and Exegetical Commentary on the Acts of the Apostles. 2 vols. International Critical Commentary. Edinburgh: T&T Clark, 1994-1998.

Barstad, H. The Religious Polemics of Amos. Supplements to Vetus Testamentum 34. Leiden: Brill, 1984.

Barth, Markus. Ephesians: Translation and Commentary on Chapters 1-3 and 4-6. 2 vols. Anchor Bible 34, 34A. Garden City, N.Y.: Doubleday, 1974.

________. The People of God. Journal for the Study of the New Testament Supplement Series 5. Sheffield: JSOT, 1983.

Barthélemy, Dominique, D. W. Gooding, J. Lust, and E. Tov. The Story of David and Goliath: Textual and Literary Criticism. Orbis biblicus et orientalis 73. Göttingen: Vandenhoeck & Ruprecht, 1986.

Barthélemy, Dominique, Adrian Schenker, and John Alexander Thompson. Preliminary and Interim Report on the Hebrew Old Testament Text Project. 5 vols. 2d ed. New York: United Bible Societies, 1979-1980.

Barthes, Roland. “The Struggle with the Angel: Textual Analysis of Genesis 32:23-33.” Pages 21-33 in Structural Analysis and Biblical Exegesis: Interpretational Essays. Edited by Roland Barthes. Pittsburgh Theological Monograph Series 3. Pittsburgh: Pickwick, 1974.

Bartlett, J. R. “The Moabites and the Edomites.” Pages 229-58 in Peoples of Old Testament Times. Edited by D. J. Wiseman. Oxford: Clarendon, 1973.

Barton, J. Amos’s Oracles Against the Nations. Society for Old Testament Studies: Monograph Series 6. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1980.

Bauckham, Richard. Jude, 2 Peter. Word Biblical Commentary 50. Waco, Tex.: Word, 1983.

Bauer, Hans, and Pontus Leander. Grammatik des Biblisch-Aramäischen. Halle/Saale: Max Niemeyer, 1927.

Beale, G. K. The Book of Revelation: A Commentary on the Greek Text. New International Greek Testament Commentary. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1999.

Berlin, Adele. Poetics and Interpretation of Biblical Narrative. Winona Lake, Ind.: Eisenbrauns, 1994.

________. Zephaniah. Anchor Bible 25A. New York: Doubleday, 1994.

Bernard, J. H. A Critical and Exegetical Commentary on the Gospel According to St. John. 2 vols. International Critical Commentary. Edinburgh: T&T Clark, 1928.

Best, Ernest. Mark: The Gospel As Story. Edinburgh: T&T Clark, 1983.

Beyer, Klaus. Semitische Syntax im Neuen Testament. Studien zur Umwelt des Neuen Testaments. Göttingen: Vandenhoeck & Ruprecht, 1962.

Biggs, Robert D. Sà.zi.ga: Ancient Mesopotamian Potency Incantations. Texts From Cuneiform Sources 2. Locust Valley, N.Y.: J. J. Augustin, 1967.

Blank, S. H. “‘Perish the Day!’ A Misdirected Curse (Job 3:3).” Pages 61-63 in Prophetic Thought: Essays and Addresses. Edited by Sheldon H. Blank. Cincinnati: Hebrew Union College Press, 1977.

Blenkinsopp, Joseph. Ezra-Nehemiah. Old Testament Library. Philadelphia: Westminster, 1988.

Block, Daniel I. The Book of Ezekiel. 2 vols. New International Commentary on the Old Testament. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1997.

Bock, Darrell L. Luke. 2 vols. Baker Exegetical Commentary on the New Testament 3AB. Grand Rapids: Baker, 1994-1996.

Boling, Robert G. Judges. Anchor Bible 6A. Garden City, N.Y.: Doubleday, 1975.

Bonsirven, Joseph. Épîtres de Saint Jean: Introduction, traduction et commentaire. New ed. Commentaire du Nouveau Testament 9. Paris: Beauchesne, 1954.

Borger, Riekele. Die Inschriften Asarhaddons, Königs von Assyrien. Archiv für Orientforschung 9. Graz: Im Selbstverlage des Herausgebers, 1956.

Borowski, Oded. Agriculture in Iron Age Israel. Winona Lake, Ind.: Eisenbrauns, 1986.

Boström, Gustav. Proverbiastudien: die Weisheit und das fremde Weib in Spr. 1-9. Lunds universitets årsskrift. Lund: C. W. K. Gleerup, 1935.

Brichto, H. C. The Problem of “Curse” in the Hebrew Bible. Journal of Biblical Literature Monograph Series 13. Philadelphia: Society of Biblical Literature, 1963.

Briggs, Charles A., and Emilie Grace Briggs. A Critical and Exegetical Commentary on the Book of Psalms. 2 vols. International Critical Commentary. Edinburgh: T&T Clark, 1906-1907.

Bright, John. Jeremiah. Anchor Bible. Garden City, N.Y.: Doubleday, 1965.

________. A History of Israel. 4th ed. Louisville, Ky.: Westminster John Knox, 2000.

Brown, Raymond E. The Gospel According to John. 2 vols. Anchor Bible 29, 29A. Garden City, N.Y.: Doubleday, 1966-1970.

________. The Epistles of John. Anchor Bible 30. Garden City, N.Y.: Doubleday, 1982.

Brownlee, William Hugh. Ezekiel 1-19. Word Biblical Commentary 28. Waco, Tex.: Word, 1986.

Bruce, F. F. The Acts of the Apostles. London: Tyndale, 1951.

________. The Book of the Acts. Rev. ed. New International Commentary on the New Testament. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1988.

Buchanan, George Wesley. The Consequences of the Covenant. Supplements to Novum Testamentum 20. Leiden: Brill, 1970.

Budd, Philip J. Numbers. Word Biblical Commentary 5. Waco, Tex.: Word, 1984.

________. Leviticus. New Century Bible Commentary. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1996.

Bullinger, E. W. Figures of Speech Used in the Bible, Explained and Illustrated. London: Eyre and Spottiswoode, 1898. Repr., Grand Rapids: Baker, 1968.

Burney, C. F. The Book of Judges. 2d ed. London: Rivingtons, 1920.

Burrows, Eric. The Oracles of Jacob and Balaam. London: Burns Oates & Washbourne, 1938.

Bush, Frederic W. Ruth, Esther. Word Biblical Commentary 9. Waco, Tex.: Word, 1996.

Buth, Randall. “Methodological Collision Between Source Criticism and Discourse Analysis.” Pages 138-54 in Biblical Hebrew and Discourse Linguistics. Edited by Robert D. Bergen. Dallas: Summer Institute of Linguistics, 1994.

Butler, Trent C. Joshua. Word Biblical Commentary 7. Waco, Tex: Word, 1983.

Caird, G. B. The Revelation of St. John the Divine. Edited by Henry Chadwick. Harper’s New Testament Commentaries. New York: Harper & Row, 1966.

Camp, Claudia V. Wisdom and the Feminine in the Book of Proverbs. Bible and Literature Series 11. Decatur, Ga.: Almond Press, 1985.

Campbell, Edward Fay. Ruth. Anchor Bible 7. Garden City, N.Y.: Doubleday, 1975.

Carr, G. Lloyd. The Song of Solomon. Tyndale Old Testament Commentaries 17. Downers Grove, Ill.: InterVarsity, 1983.

Caspari, C. P. A Grammar of the Arabic Language. 3d ed. Translated and edited by William Wright. 3d edition revised by William Robertson Smith and Michael Jan de Goeje. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1933.

Cassuto, Umberto. A Commentary on the Book of Genesis: From Adam to Noah. Translated by Israel Abrahams. Jerusalem: Magnes, 1961.

________. The Documentary Hypothesis and the Composition of the Pentateuch. Translated by Israel Abrahams. 1st English ed. Jerusalem: Magnes, 1961.

________. A Commentary on the Book of Exodus. Translated by Israel Abrahams. Jerusalem: Magnes, 1967.

Cathcart, Kevin J. Nahum in the Light of Northwest Semitic. Biblica et orientalia 26. Rome: Pontifical Biblical Institute, 1973.

Cathcart, Kevin J., and R. P. Gordon. The Targum of the Minor Prophets. The Aramaic Bible 14. Wilmington, Del.: M. Glazier, 1989.

Childs, Brevard S. Memory and Tradition in Israel. Studies in Biblical Theology 37. Naperville, Ill.: Allenson, 1962.

________. The Book of Exodus: A Critical, Theological Commentary. Old Testament Library. Philadelphia: Westminster, 1974.

Chirichigno, G. C. Debt-Slavery in Israel and the Ancient Near East. Journal for the Study of the Old Testament: Supplement Series 141. Sheffield: Sheffield Academic Press, 1993.

Chisholm, Robert B. “A Theology of the Psalms.” Pages 257-304 in A Biblical Theology of the Old Testament. Edited by Roy B. Zuck. Chicago: Moody, 1991.

________. “Evidence From Genesis.” Pages 35-54 in A Case for Premillennialism: A New Consensus. Edited by Donald K. Campbell and Jeffrey L. Townsend. Chicago: Moody, 1992.

________. From Exegesis to Exposition: A Practical Guide to Using Biblical Hebrew. Grand Rapids: Baker, 1998.

Christensen, Duane L. Deuteronomy 1-11. Word Biblical Commentary 6A. Dallas: Word, 1991.

Clark, Gordon R. The Word Hesed in the Hebrew Bible. Journal for the Study of the Old Testament: Supplement Series 157. Sheffield: JSOT, 1993.

Clements, R. E. Isaiah 1-39. New Century Bible Commentary. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1980.

Clines, David J. A. Ezra, Nehemiah, Esther. New Century Bible Commentary. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1984.

________. Job. Word Biblical Commentary 17. Waco, Tex.: Word, 1989.

Coats, George W. Rebellion in the Wilderness. Nashville: Abingdon, 1968.

Cody, Aelred. A History of Old Testament Priesthood. Rome: Pontifical Biblical Institute, 1969.

Cogan, Mordechai, and Hayim Tadmor. II Kings. Anchor Bible 11. Garden City, N.Y.: Doubleday, 1988.

Cohen, Abraham. Proverbs. Soncino Books of the Bible. London: Soncino, 1945.

________. The Five Megilloth. Soncino Books of the Bible. London: Soncino, 1946.

________. The Psalms. Edited by Ephraim Oratz. 2d ed. Soncino Books of the Bible. New York: Soncino, 1992.

Cohen, Harold R. Biblical Hapax Legomena in the Light of Akkadian and Ugaritic. Society of Biblical Literature Dissertation Series 37. Missoula, Mont.: Scholars, 1978.

Cole, R. A. Exodus: An Introduction and Commentary. Tyndale Old Testament Commentaries. Downers Grove, Ill.: InterVarsity, 1973.

Collins, John Joseph. Daniel. Hermeneia. Minneapolis: Fortress, 1993.

Cook, Albert Spaulding. The Root of the Thing: A Study of Job and the Song of Songs. Bloomington, Ind.: Indiana University Press, 1968.

Craigie, Peter C. The Book of Deuteronomy. New International Commentary on the Old Testament. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1976.

________. The Problem of War in the Old Testament. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1978.

________. Psalms 1-50. Word Biblical Commentary 19. Waco, Tex.: Word, 1983.

Craigie, Peter C., Page H. Kelley, and Joel F. Drinkard, Jr. Jeremiah 1-25. Word Biblical Commentary. Dallas: Word, 1991.

Cramer, J. A., ed. Catenae in euangelia Lucae et Joannis. Oxford: Oxford University Press, 1841.

Cranfield, C. E. B. The Epistle to the Romans. Edited by J. A. Emerton and C. E. B. Cranfield. 2 vols. International Critical Commentary. Edinburgh: T&T Clark, 1975-1979.

Crenshaw, James L. A Whirlpool of Torment: Israelite Traditions of God As an Oppressive Presence. Overtures to Biblical Theology 12. Philadelphia: Fortress, 1984.

Cross, Frank M. “The Divine Warrior in Israel’s Early Cult.” Pages 11-30 in Biblical Motifs: Origins and Transformations. Edited by A. Altman. Philip W. Lown Institute of Advanced Judaic Studies, Brandeis University: Studies and Texts 3. Cambridge: Harvard University Press, 1966.

Cross, Frank M., and David Noel Freedman. Studies in Ancient Yahwistic Poetry. Society of Biblical Literature Dissertation Series 21. Missoula, Mont.: Scholars, 1975.

Cullmann, Oscar. Peter: Disciple, Apostle, Martyr: A Historical and Theological Study. 2d ed. The Library of History and Doctrine. Philadelphia: Westminster, 1962.

Cumont, Franz Valery Marie. After Life in Roman Paganism. New Haven: Yale University Press, 1922. Repr., New York: Dover, 1959.

Currid, John D. Ancient Egypt and the Old Testament. Grand Rapids: Baker, 1997.

Dahood, Mitchell J. Proverbs and Northwest Semitic Philology. Scripta Pontificii Instituti Biblici 113. Rome: Pontifical Biblical Institute, 1963.

________. Psalms. Anchor Bible 16-17A. Garden City, N. Y.: Doubleday, 1966.

Dalman, Gustaf. Arbeit und Sitte in Palästina. Schriften des Deutschen Palästina-Instituts. Gütersloh: C. Bertelsmann, 1928.

Davidson, A. B. The Book of Job. New ed. Cambridge Bible for Schools and Colleges. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1918.

Davies, Graham I. The Way of the Wilderness: A Geographical Study of the Wilderness Itineraries in the Old Testament. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1979.

________. Ancient Hebrew Inscriptions: Corpus and Concordance. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1991.

Davies, W. D., and Dale C. Allison, Jr. Matthew. 3 vols. International Critical Commentary. Edinburgh: T&T Clark, 1988-1997.

Davis, John James. Biblical Numerology. Grand Rapids: Baker, 1968.

Day, John. Molech: A God of Human Sacrifice in the Old Testament. University of Cambridge Oriental Publications. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1989.

Decker, Rodney J. Temporal Deixis of the Greek Verb in the Gospel of Mark with Reference to Verbal Aspect. Edited by D. A. Carson. Studies in Biblical Greek 10. New York: Peter Lang, 2001.

de Waard, Jan. A Handbook on Isaiah. Textual Criticism and the Translator 1. Winona Lake, Ind.: Eisenbrauns, 1997.

DeWit, C. The Date and Route of the Exodus. London: Tyndale, 1960.

Dhorme, E. A Commentary on the Book of Job. Translated by Harold Knight. London: T. Nelson, 1967.

Dillmann, August. Genesis, Critically and Exegetically Expounded. Translated by William B. Stevenson. 2 vols. Edinburgh: T&T Clark, 1897.

Dittenberger, Wilhelm, ed. Sylloge Inscriptionum Graecarum. Lipsiae: S. Hirzelium, 1915-1924.

Dobbs-Allsopp, F. W. Lamentations. Interpretation: A Bible Commentary for Preaching and Teaching. Louisville, Ky.: John Knox, 2002.

Dodd, C. H. The Johannine Epistles. Moffatt New Testament Commentary. London: Hodder and Stoughton, 1946.

Dods, Marcus. “The Gospel of St. John.” Pages 653-872 in The Expositor’s Greek Testament. Edited by W. Robertson Nicoll. 5 vols. London: Hodder and Stoughton, 1897-1910.

Douglas, Mary. Purity and Danger: An Analysis of Concepts of Pollution and Taboo. London: Routledge & Kegan Paul, 1966.

Driver, G. R. Canaanite Myths and Legends. Edited by J. C. L. Gibson. 2d ed. Edinburgh: T&T Clark, 1978.

Driver, S. R. A Treatise on the Use of the Tenses in Hebrew and Some Other Syntactical Questions. 3d ed. Oxford: Clarendon, 1892.

________. A Critical and Exegetical Commentary on Deuteronomy. 3d ed. International Critical Commentary. Edinburgh: T&T Clark, 1902.

________. The Book of the Prophet Jeremiah. London: Hodder and Stoughton, 1906.

________. The Book of Exodus. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1911.

________. Notes on the Hebrew Text and the Topography of the Books of Samuel. 2d ed. Oxford: Clarendon, 1960.

Driver, S. R., and George Buchanan Gray. A Critical and Exegetical Commentary on the Book of Job. 2 vols. International Critical Commentary. Edinburgh: T&T Clark, 1921.

Dunn, J. D. G. Romans. 2 vols. Word Biblical Commentary 38AB. Dallas: Word, 1988.

________. “Once More, ΠΙΣΤΙΣ ΧΡΙΣΤΟΥ.” Pages 730-44 in SBL Seminar Papers, 1991. Society of Biblical Literature Seminar Papers 30. Atlanta: Scholars, 1991.

Durham, John I. Exodus. Word Biblical Commentary 3. Dallas: Word, 1987.

Eaton, J. H. Kingship and the Psalms. Studies in Biblical Theology: Second Series 32. Naperville, Ill.: Allenson, 1976.

Eaton, M. A. Ecclesiastes. Tyndale Old Testament Commentaries. Downers Grove, Ill.: InterVarsity, 1983.

Ehrman, Bart D. The Orthodox Corruption of Scripture: The Effect of Early Christological Controversies on the Text of the New Testament. New York: Oxford University Press, 1993.

Eichrodt, Walther. Theology of the Old Testament. Translated by J. A. Baker. Old Testament Library. London: S.C.M., 1961-1967.

Eissfeldt, O. “Renaming in the Old Testament.” Pages 70-83 in Words and Meanings. Edited by P. R. Ackroyd and B. Lindars. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1968.

Ellis, E. Earle. “The Silenced Wives of Corinth (I Cor. 14:34-5).” Pages 213-20 in New Testament Textual Criticism: Its Significance for Exegesis. Edited by Eldon Jay Epp and Gordon D. Fee. Oxford: Clarendon, 1981.

Engnell, I. “‘Knowledge’ and ‘Life’ in the Creation Story.” Pages 103-19 in Wisdom in Israel and in the Ancient Near East. Edited by Martin Noth and D. Winton Thomas. Supplements to Vetus Testamentum 3. Leiden: Brill, 1955.

Falk, Marcia. Love Lyrics From the Bible: A Translation and Literary Study of the Song of Songs. Bible and Literature Series 4. Sheffield: Almond, 1982.

Fanning, Buist M. Verbal Aspect in New Testament Greek. Oxford Theological Monographs. New York: Oxford University Press, 1990.

Fee, Gordon D. The First Epistle to the Corinthians. Edited by F. F. Bruce. New International Commentary on the New Testament. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1987.

________. Paul’s Letter to the Philippians. New International Commentary on the New Testament. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1995.

Fensham, F. Charles. The Books of Ezra and Nehemiah. New International Commentary on the Old Testament. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1982.

Figart, Thomas O. A Biblical Perspective on the Race Problem. Grand Rapids: Baker, 1973.

Fishbane, Michael A. Biblical Interpretation in Ancient Israel. Oxford: Clarendon, 1985.

________. Biblical Text and Texture: A Literary Reading of Selected Texts. Oxford: Oneworld, 1998.

Fitzmyer, Joseph A. The Aramaic Inscriptions of Sefîre. Biblica et orientalia 19. Rome: Pontifical Biblical Institute, 1967.

________. The Gospel According to Luke. 2 vols. Anchor Bible 28, 28A. Garden City, N.Y.: Doubleday, 1981-1985.

________. Romans: A New Translation with Introduction and Commentary. Edited by W. F. Albright and David Noel Freedman. Anchor Bible 33. Garden City, N.Y.: Doubleday, 1993.

Fohrer, Georg. Introduction to the Old Testament. Nashville: Abingdon, 1968.

Fokkelman, J. P. Narrative Art in Genesis: Specimens of Stylistic and Structural Analysis. Studia semitica neerlandica 17. Assen: Van Gorcum, 1975.

Fox, Michael V. The Song of Songs and the Ancient Egyptian Love Songs. Madison, Wis.: University of Wisconsin Press, 1985.

Fraser, J. G. Folklore in the Old Testament. London: Macmillan, 1919. Repr., New York: Hart, 1975.

Freedman, David Noel. “Strophe and Meter in Exodus 15.” Pages 163-203 in A Light Unto My Path: Old Testament Studies in Honor of Jacob M. Myers. Edited by Howard N. Bream, Ralph D. Heim, and Carey A. Moore. Philadelphia: Temple University Press, 1974.

Freedman, David Noel, and K. A. Mathews. The Paleo-Hebrew Leviticus Scroll (11QpaleoLev). Philadelphia: American Schools of Oriental Research, 1985.

Freedman, David Noel, and A. Welch. “Amos’s Earthquake and Israelite Prophecy.” Pages 188-98 in Scripture and Other Artifacts. Edited by M. Coogan, J. C. Exum, and L. E. Stager. Louisville: Westminster John Knox, 1994.

Freedman, H. Jeremiah. Soncino Books of the Bible. London: Soncino, 1949.

Freeman, Hobart E. An Introduction to the Old Testament Prophets. Chicago: Moody, 1969.

Gamble, Harry Y. The Textual History of the Letter to the Romans: A Study in Textual and Literary Criticism. Studies and Documents 42. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1977.

Garrett, Duane. Rethinking Genesis. Grand Rapids: Baker, 1991.

Garstang, John. Joshua-Judges. New York: Smith, 1931.

Gemser, B. “The rîb – or Controversy – Pattern in Hebrew Mentality.” Pages 120-37 in Wisdom in Israel and in the Ancient Near East. Edited by M. Noth and D. Winton Thomas. Supplements to Vetus Testamentum 3. Leiden: Brill, 1955.

George, Timothy. Galatians. New American Commentary 30. Nashville: Broadman & Holman, 1994.

Gerleman, Gillis. Ruth, Das Hohelied. 2d ed. Biblischer Kommentar, Altes Testament 18. Neukirchen-Vluyn: Neukirchener Verlag, 1981.

Gerstenberger, Erhard S. Psalms, Part 1. Forms of the Old Testament Literature 14. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1987.

________. Leviticus: A Commentary. Translated by Douglas W. Stott. Old Testament Library. Louisville, Ky.: Westminster John Knox, 1996.

Gill, D., and C. Gempf, eds. The Book of Acts in Its Graeco-Roman Setting. Vol. 2 of The Book of Acts in its First Century Setting. Edited by Bruce Winter. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1994.

Ginsberg, Harold Louis. The Legend of King Keret: A Canaanite Epic of the Bronze Age. Bulletin of the American Schools of Oriental Research: Supplement Series 2-3. New Haven, Conn.: American Schools of Oriental Research, 1946.

Glasson, T. F. Moses in the Fourth Gospel. Studies in Biblical Theology 40. Naperville, Ill.: A. R. Allenson, 1963.

Glazier-McDonald, Beth. Malachi, the Divine Messenger. Society of Biblical Literature Dissertation Series 98. Atlanta: Scholars, 1987.

Glickman, S. Craig. A Song for Lovers. Downers Grove, Ill.: InterVarsity, 1976.

Glueck, N. “Incense Altars.” Pages 325-29 in Translating and Understanding the Old Testament. Edited by H. T. Frank and W. L. Reed. Nashville: Abingdon, 1970.

Goldingay, John. Daniel. Word Biblical Commentary. Dallas: Word, 1989.

Goppelt, Leonhard.Theology of the New Testament. 2 vols. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1981-1982.

Gordis, Robert. The Song of Songs and Lamentations. Rev. ed. New York: Ktav, 1974.

________. The Book of Job. New York: Jewish Theological Seminary of America, 1978.

Gordon, C. H. “Biblical Customs and the Nuzu Tablets.” Pages 21-33 in The Biblical Archaeologist Reader. Edited by George E. Wright, David Noel Freedman, and Edward F. Campbell. 4 vols. Garden City, N.Y.: Anchor, 1961-1983.

Gottwald, Norman K. Studies in the Book of Lamentations. Studies in Biblical Theology 14. London: S.C.M., 1954.

________. The Tribes of Yahweh: A Sociology of the Religion of Liberated Israel, 1250-1050 B.C.E. Maryknoll, N.Y.: Orbis, 1979.

Goulder, M. D. The Song of Fourteen Songs. Journal for the Study of the Old Testament: Supplement Series 36. Sheffield: JSOT, 1986.

Gowan, Donald E. When Man Becomes God: Humanism and Hybris in the Old Testament. Pittsburgh Theological Monograph Series 6. Pittsburgh: Pickwick, 1975.

Gray, George Buchanan. A Critical and Exegetical Commentary on Numbers. International Critical Commentary. Edinburgh: T&T Clark, 1903.

________. Sacrifice in the Old Testament: Its Theory and Practice. New York: Ktav, 1971.

Green, Joel B. The Gospel of Luke. Edited by Gordon D. Fee. New International Commentary on the New Testament. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1997.

Greenberg, Moshe. Ezekiel. 2 vols. Anchor Bible. Garden City, N.Y.: Doubleday, 1983-1997.

Greenstone, Julius H. Proverbs. The Holy Scriptures. Philadelphia: Jewish Publication Society of America, 1950.

Hafemann, Scott J. Paul, Moses, and the History of Israel: The Letter/Spirit Contrast and the Argument From Scripture in 2 Corinthians 3. Edited by Martin Hengel and Otfried Hofius. Wissenschaftliche Untersuchungen zum Neuen Testament 81. Tübingen: Mohr Siebeck, 1995.

Hagner, Donald A. Matthew. 2 vols. Word Biblical Commentary 33AB. Dallas: Word, 1993-1995.

Haldar, Alfred. Studies in the Book of Nahum. Uppsala: Lundequistska bokhandeln, 1947.

Hamlin, J. E. “The Liberator’s Ordeal: A Study of Exodus 4:1-9.” Pages 33-42 in Rhetorical Criticism: Essays in Honor of James Muilenburg. Edited by Jared J. Jackson and Martin Kessler. Pittsburgh Theological Monograph Series 1. Pittsburgh: Pickwick, 1974.

Haran, M. “The Passover Sacrifice.” Pages 86-116 in Studies in the Religion of Ancient Israel. Supplements to Vetus Testamentum 23. Leiden: Brill, 1972.

Harland, J. P. “Sodom and Gomorrah.” Pages 41-75 in The Biblical Archaeologist Reader. Edited by George E. Wright, David Noel Freedman, and Edward F. Campbell. 4 vols. Garden City, N.Y.: Anchor, 1961-1983.

Harris, Murray J. Colossians & Philemon. Exegetical Guide to the Greek New Testament. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1991.

Harris, W. Hall. The Descent of Christ: Ephesians 4:7-11 and Traditional Hebrew Imagery. Arbeiten zur Geschichte des antiken Judentums und des Urchristentums 32. Leiden: Brill, 1996.

Harrison, R. K. Healing Herbs of the Bible. Leiden: Brill, 1966.

________. Leviticus. Tyndale Old Testament Commentaries. Downers Grove, Ill.: InterVarsity, 1980.

________. Numbers. Wycliffe Exegetical Commentary. Chicago: Moody, 1990.

Hartley, John E. The Book of Job. New International Commentary on the Old Testament. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1988.

________. Leviticus. Word Biblical Commentary 4. Dallas: Word, 1992.

Hayes, John Haralson, and Stuart A. Irvine. Isaiah, the Eighth Century Prophet: His Times and His Preaching. Nashville: Abingdon, 1987.

Hays, Richard B. The Faith of Jesus Christ: An Investigation of the Narrative Substructure of Galatians 3:1-4:11. Society of Biblical Literature Dissertation Series 56. Chico, Calif.: Scholars, 1983.

Heater, Homer. A Septuagint Translation Technique in the Book of Job. Catholic Biblical Quarterly: Monograph Series 11. Washington, DC: Catholic Biblical Association, 1982.

Heidel, Alexander. The Gilgamesh Epic and Old Testament Parallels. Chicago: University of Chicago Press, 1946.

Heider, George C. The Cult of Molek: A Reassessment. Journal for the Study of the Old Testament: Supplement Series 43. Sheffield: University of Sheffield, 1985.

Hepper, F. N. Illustrated Encyclopedia of Bible Plants. Grand Rapids: Baker, 1992.

Herbert, A. S. Genesis 12-50. Torch Bible Commentaries. London: S.C.M., 1962.

Hillers, Delbert R. Treaty-Curses and the Old Testament Prophets. Biblica et Orientalia 16. Rome: Pontifical Biblical Institute, 1964.

________. Lamentations. Anchor Bible 7A. Garden City, N. Y.: Doubleday, 1979.

________. Micah. Hermeneia. Philadelphia: Fortress, 1984.

Hindson, Edward E. The Philistines and the Old Testament. Baker Studies in Biblical Archaeology. Grand Rapids: Baker, 1972.

Hoehner, Harold W. Herod Antipas. Society for New Testament Studies Monograph Series 17. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1972.

________. Ephesians. Grand Rapids: Baker, 2002.

Hoffner, H. A., Jr. “Hittites.” Pages 127-55 in Peoples of the Old Testament World. Edited by Alfred J. Hoerth, Gerald L. Mattingly, and Edwin M. Yamauchi. Grand Rapids: Baker, 1996.

Holladay, William L. Jeremiah. 2 vols. Hermeneia. Philadelphia: Fortress, 1986-1989.

________. A Concise Hebrew and Aramaic Lexicon of the Old Testament. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1988.

Houtman, Cornelis. Exodus. Edited by Johan Rebel and Sierd Woudstra. 4 vols. Historical Commentary on the Old Testament. Kampen: Kok, 1993-.

Howard, David M. “Philistines.” Pages 231-50 in Peoples of the Old Testament World. Edited by Alfred J. Hoerth, Gerald L. Mattingly, and Edwin M. Yamauchi. Grand Rapids: Baker, 1994.

Hubbard, B. J. The Matthean Redaction of a Primitive Apostolic Commissioning: An Exegesis of Matthew 28:16-20. Society of Biblical Literature Dissertation Series 19. Missoula, Mont.: Scholars, 1974.

Hubbard, Robert L., Jr. The Book of Ruth. New International Commentary on the Old Testament. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1988.

Hübner, Hans. Gottes Ich und Israel: zum Schriftgebrauch des Paulus in Römer 9-11. Forschungen zur Religion und Literatur des Alten und Neuen Testaments 136. Göttingen: Vandenhoeck & Ruprecht, 1984.

Huey, F. B. Jeremiah, Lamentations. New American Commentary 16. Nashville: Broadman, 1993.

Huffmon, H. B. “Exodus 23:4-5: A Comparative Study.” Pages 271-78 in A Light Unto My Path: Old Testament Studies in Honor of Jacob M. Myers. Edited by Howard N. Bream, Ralph D. Heim, and Carey A. Moore. Philadelphia: Temple University Press, 1974.

Hyatt, J. Philip. Exodus. New Century Bible Commentary. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1980.

Isserlin, B. S. J. The Israelites. New York: Thames and Hudson, 1998.

Jacob, Benno. The Second Book of the Bible: Exodus. Translated by Walter Jacob. Hoboken, N.J.: Ktav, 1992.

Jacob, E. “Sagesse et Alphabet: Pr. 31:10-31.” Pages 287-95 in Hommages À André Dupont-Sommer. Edited by A. Caquot and M. Philonenko. Paris: Adrien-Maisonneuve, 1971.

Jacob, Edmond. Theology of the Old Testament. New York: Harper & Brothers, 1958.

James, E. O. The Tree of Life: An Archaeological Study. Studies in the History of Religions 11. Leiden: Brill, 1966.

Japhet, Sara. I & II Chronicles. Old Testament Library. Louisville, Ky.: Westminster John Knox, 1993.

Johnson, Aubrey R. The Vitality of the Individual in the Thought of Ancient Israel. Cardiff: University of Wales Press, 1949.

________. “The Primary Meaning of √גאל.” Pages 67-77 in Congress Volume: Copenhagen, 1953. Supplements to Vetus Testamentum 1. Leiden: Brill, 1953.

Junker, Hubert. Die zwolfe kleinen Propheten. Bonn: Hanstein, 1938.

Kaminsky, Joel. Corporate Responsibility in the Hebrew Bible. Journal for the Study of the Old Testament: Supplement Series 196. Sheffield: Sheffield Academic Press, 1995.

Käsemann, Ernst. Commentary on Romans. Translated and edited by Geoffrey W. Bromiley. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1980.

Keel, Othmar. The Symbolism of the Biblical World: Ancient Near Eastern Iconography and the Book of Psalms. Translated by Timothy J. Hallett. New York: Seabury, 1978.

Keener, Craig S. The IVP Bible Background Commentary: New Testament. Downers Grove, Ill.: InterVarsity, 1993.

Keown, Gerald L., Pamela J. Scalise, and Thomas G. Smothers. Jeremiah 26-52. Word Biblical Commentary. Dallas: Word, 1995.

Kessler, Martin. “Rhetorical Criticism of Genesis 7.” Pages 1-17 in Rhetorical Criticism: Essays in Honor of James Muilenburg. Edited by Jared Jackson and Martin Kessler. Pittsburgh Theological Monograph Series Pittsburgh: Pickwick, 1974.

Kidner, Derek. The Proverbs: An Introduction and Commentary. Tyndale Old Testament Commentaries. London: Tyndale, 1964.

________. Genesis: An Introduction and Commentary. Tyndale Old Testament Commentaries. Chicago: InterVarsity, 1967.

Kikawada, I. M., and A. Quinn. Before Abraham Was: The Unity of Genesis 1-11. Nashville: Abingdon, 1985.

Kilmer, Anne D. “The Mesopotamian Counterparts of the Biblical Nephilim.” Pages 39-43 in Perspectives on Language and Text. Edited by Edgar W. Conrad and Edward G. Newing. Winona Lake, Ind.: Eisenbrauns, 1987.

King, L. W. Chronicles Concerning Early Babylonian Kings: Including Records of the Early History of the Kassites and the Country of the Sea. Studies in Eastern History 2-3. London: Luzac, 1907.

King, Philip J. Amos, Hosea, Micah: An Archaeological Commentary. Philadelphia: Westminister, 1988.

Kissane, Edward J. The Book of Isaiah. Dublin: Richview, 1941.

Kitchen, K. A. Ancient Orient and Old Testament. Chicago: InterVarsity, 1966.

________. “The Philistines.” Pages 53-78 in Peoples of Old Testament Times. Edited by D. J. Wiseman. Oxford: Clarendon, 1973.

________. On the Reliability of the Old Testament. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 2003.

Klein, Ernest. A Comprehensive Etymological Dictionary of the Hebrew Language for Readers of English. New York: Macmillan, 1987.

Klein, Ralph W. 1 Samuel. Word Biblical Commentary 10. Waco, Tex.: Word, 1983.

Kline, Meredith G. Treaty of the Great King: The Covenant Structure of Deuteronomy. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1963.

________. The Structure of Biblical Authority. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1972.

Knight, George W., III. The Pastoral Epistles: A Commentary on the Greek Text. Edited by I. Howard Marshall and W. Ward Gasque. New International Greek Testament Commentary. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1992.

König, Eduard. Stilistik, Rhetorik, Poetik in Bezug auf die biblische Litteratur. Leipzig: Dieterich, 1900.

Kramer, Samuel Noah. The Sacred Marriage Rite: Aspects of Faith, Myth, and Ritual in Ancient Sumer. Bloomington: Indiana University Press, 1969.

Kugel, James L. The Idea of Biblical Poetry: Parallelism and Its History. New Haven: Yale University Press, 1981.

Labuschagne, C. J. “The Emphasizing Particle GAM and Its Connotations.” Pages 193-203 in Studia biblica et semitica. Wageningen: H. Veenman, 1966.

________. The Incomparability of Yahweh in the Old Testament. Pretoria Oriental Series 5. Leiden: Brill, 1966.

Lambdin, Thomas O. Introduction to Biblical Hebrew. New York: Scribner, 1971.

Lane, Edward William. An Arabic-English Lexicon. Beirut: Librairie du Liban, 1968.

Lane, William L. The Gospel According to Mark. Edited by F. F. Bruce. New International Commentary on the New Testament 2. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1974.

Lang, B. Frau Weisheit. Dusseldorf: Patmos, 1975.

Layard, Austen Henry. Nineveh and Its Remains. New York: G. P. Putnam, 1849.

Levin, Étan. The Aramaic Version of Jonah. 3d ed. New York: Sepher-Hermon, 1981.

Levine, Baruch A. In the Presence of the Lord: A Study of Cult and Some Cultic Terms in Ancient Israel. Studies in Judaism in Late Antiquity 5. Leiden: Brill, 1974.

________. Leviticus. Jerusalem Publication Society Torah Commentary 3. Philadelphia: Jewish Publication Society, 1989.

Lichtheim, Miriam. Ancient Egyptian Literature: A Book of Readings. 3 vols. Berkeley: University of California Press, 1973.

Lincoln, Andrew T. Ephesians. Word Biblical Commentary 42. Dallas: Word, 1990.

Lindars, Barnabas. Judges 1-5. Edinburgh: T&T Clark, 1995.

Liver, J. “Korah, Dathan and Abiram.” Pages 189-217 in Studies in the Bible. Edited by Chaim Rabin. Scripta hierosolymitana 8. Jerusalem: Magnes, 1961.

Loewe, R. “Divine Frustration Exegetically Frustrated.” Pages 137-58 in Words and Meanings. Edited by Peter R. Ackroyd and Barnabas Lindars. London: Cambridge University Press, 1968.

Loewenstamm, Samuel E., ed. Thesaurus of the Language of the Bible. 3 vols. Jerusalem: Bible Concordance Press, 1957-1968.

Long, V. Philips. The Art of Biblical History. Foundations of Contemporary Interpretation 5. Grand Rapids: Zondervan, 1994.

Longacre, R. “Weqatal Forms in Biblical Hebrew Prose: A Discourse-modular Approach.” Pages 50-98 in Biblical Hebrew and Discourse Linguistics. Edited by Robert D. Bergen. Dallas: Summer Institute of Linguistics, 1994.

Longman, Tremper III. “Nahum.” In The Minor Prophets. Edited by Thomas E. McComiskey. 3 vols. Grand Rapids: Baker, 1993.

________. The Book of Ecclesiastes. New International Commentary on the Old Testament. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1998.

Löw, Immanuel. Die Flora Der Juden. 4 vols. Hildesheim: G. Olms, 1967.

Luckenbill, Daniel David. Ancient Records of Assyria and Babylonia. Chicago: University of Chicago Press, 1926.

MacDonald, W. G. “Christology and ‘The Angel of the Lord’.” Pages 324-35 in Current Issues in Biblical and Patristic Interpretation. Edited by Gerald F. Hawthorne. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1975.

Maier, Walter Arthur. The Book of Nahum. Saint Louis: Concordia, 1959.

Malina, Bruce J. The Palestinian Manna Tradition: The Manna Tradition in the Palestinian Targums and Its Relationship to the New Testament Writings. Leiden: Brill, 1968.

Mann, Thomas W. Divine Presence and Guidance in Israelite Traditions: The Typology of Exaltation. Baltimore: Johns Hopkins University Press, 1977.

________. The Book of the Torah: The Narrative Integrity of the Pentateuch. Atlanta: John Knox, 1988.

Marshall, I. Howard. The Gospel of Luke: A Commentary on the Greek Text. New International Greek Testament Commentary 3. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1978.

Maurice, Frederick Denison. The Doctrine of Sacrifice, Deduced From the Scriptures: A Series of Sermons. London: Macmillan, 1893.

McCaffrey, James. The House With Many Rooms: The Temple Theme of Jn. 14, 2-3. Analecta biblica 114. Rome: Pontifical Biblical Institute, 1988.

McCarter, P. Kyle, Jr. I Samuel. Anchor Bible 8. Garden City, N.Y.: Doubleday, 1980.

________. II Samuel. Anchor Bible 9. Garden City, N.Y.: Doubleday, 1984.

________. Textual Criticism: Recovering the Text of the Hebrew Bible. Guides to Biblical Scholarship. Philadelphia: Fortress, 1986.

McKane, William. Proverbs: A New Approach. Old Testament Library. Philadelphia: Westminster, 1970.

________. A Critical and Exegetical Commentary on Jeremiah. International Critical Commentary. Edinburgh: T&T Clark, 1986-1996.

McLaughlin, J. L. The “Marzeah” in the Prophetic Literature: An Examination of the References and Allusions in Light of the Extra-Biblical Evidence. Supplements to Vetus Testamentum 86. Leiden: Brill, 2001.

McNeile, A. H. The Book of Numbers. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1911.

Meeks, Wayne A. The Prophet-King: Moses Traditions and the Johannine Christology. Supplements to Novum Testamentum 14. Leiden: Brill, 1967.

Mendenhall, George E. The Tenth Generation: The Origins of the Biblical Tradition. Baltimore: Johns Hopkins University Press, 1973.

Merrill, Eugene H. Kingdom of Priests: A History of Old Testament Israel. Grand Rapids: Baker, 1987.

________. Deuteronomy. New American Commentary 4. Nashville: Broadman & Holman, 1994.

Merwe, C. H. J. van der, J. A. Naudé, and Jan H. Kroeze. Biblical Hebrew Reference Grammar. Biblical Languages – Hebrew 3. Sheffield: Sheffield Academic Press, 1999.

Mettinger, Tryggve N. D. In Search of God: The Meaning and Message of the Everlasting Names. Translated by Frederick H. Cryer. Philadelphia: Fortress, 1988.

Metzger, Bruce M. “The Punctuation of Rom. 9:5.” Pages 95-112 in Christ and the Spirit in the New Testament: In Honour of Charles Francis Digby Moule. Edited by B. Lindars and S. Smalley. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1973.

Meyers, Carol L. The Tabernacle Menorah: A Synthetic Study of a Symbol From the Biblical Cult. American Schools of Oriental Research Dissertation Series 2. Missoula, Mont.: Scholars, 1976.

Milgrom, Jacob. Studies in Levitical Terminology. Near Eastern Studies 14. Berkeley: University of California, 1970.

________. Studies in Cultic Theology and Terminology. Studies in Judaism in Late Antiquity 36. Leiden: Brill, 1983.

________. Numbers. Jerusalem Publication Society Torah Commentary. Philadelphia: Jewish Publication Society, 1990.

________. Leviticus. 3 vols. Anchor Bible 3. New York: Doubleday, 1991-2001.

Miller, Cynthia L. The Representation of Speech in Biblical Hebrew Narrative: A Linguistic Analysis. Harvard Semitic Monographs 55. Atlanta: Scholars, 1996.

Miller, Patrick D. Sin and Judgment in the Prophets: A Stylistic and Theological Analysis. Society of Biblical Literature Monograph Series 27. Chico, Calif.: Scholars, 1982.

Monier-Williams, Monier. A Sanskrit-English Dictionary Etymologically and Philologically Arranged with Special Reference to Cognate Indo-European Languages. New ed. Oxford: Clarendon, 1899.

Montgomery, James A. A Critical and Exegetical Commentary on the Book of Daniel. International Critical Commentary. Edinburgh: T&T Clark, 1964.

Moo, Douglas J. Romans 1-8. Wycliffe Exegetical Commentary. Chicago: Moody, 1991.

________. The Epistle to the Romans. Edited by Gordon D. Fee. New International Commentary on the New Testament. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1996.

Moore, Carey A. Esther. Anchor Bible 7B. Garden City, N.Y.: Doubleday, 1971.

Moore, George Foot. A Critical and Exegetical Commentary on Judges. 2d ed. International Critical Commentary. Edinburgh: T&T Clark, 1908.

Moran, William L. “A Kingdom of Priests.” Pages 7-20 in The Bible in Current Catholic Thought. Edited by John L. McKenzie. Saint Mary’s Theology Studies 1. New York: Herder and Herder, 1962.

Morris, H. M. The Remarkable Record of Job. Grand Rapids: Baker, 1988.

Morris, Leon. The Gospel According to John. Rev. ed. New International Commentary on the New Testament. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1995.

________. The Gospel According to John. Rev. ed. New International Commentary on the New Testament. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1995.

Moscati, Sabatino. An Introduction to the Comparative Grammar of the Semitic Languages: Phonology and Morphology. Porta linguarum orientalium: Neue Serie 6. Wiesbaden: Harrassowitz, 1980.

Motyer, J. A. The Prophecy of Isaiah. Downers Grove, Ill.: InterVarsity, 1993.

Moule, C. F. D. The Phenomenon of the New Testament. Studies in Biblical Theology: Second Series 1. London: S.C.M., 1967.

Mounce, Robert H. The Book of Revelation. Edited by F. F. Bruce. New International Commentary on the New Testament 17. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1977.

Murphy, Roland Edmund. The Song of Songs. Hermeneia. Minneapolis: Fortress, 1990.

Murray, John. The Epistle to the Romans. Edited by F. F. Bruce. 2 vols. New International Commentary on the New Testament. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1959-1965.

Neusner, Jacob. The Idea of Purity in Ancient Judaism. Leiden: Brill, 1973.

Niditch, Susan. War in the Hebrew Bible: A Study in the Ethics of Violence. New York: Oxford University Press, 1993.

Niehaus, Jeffrey J. God At Sinai: Covenant and Theophany in the Bible and Ancient Near East. Studies in Old Testament Biblical Theology. Grand Rapids: Zondervan, 1995.

Nineham, D. E. Historicity and Chronology in the New Testament. Society for Promoting Christian Knowledge Theological Collections 6. London: SPCK, 1965.

Nolland, John. Luke. 3 vols. Word Biblical Commentary 35ABC. Dallas: Word, 1989-1993.

Noordtzij, A. Numbers. Bible Student’s Commentary. Grand Rapids: Zondervan, 1983.

North, Christopher R. The Second Isaiah. Oxford: Clarendon, 1964.

Noth, Martin. Exodus. Old Testament Library. Philadelphia: Westminster, 1962.

________. Numbers. Translated by James D. Martin. Old Testament Library. Philadelphia: Westminster, 1968.

O’Brien, Peter T. Colossians, Philemon. Edited by David A. Hubbard and Glenn W. Barker. Word Biblical Commentary 44. Waco, Tex.: Word, 1982.

________. The Epistle to the Philippians: A Commentary on the Greek Text. Edited by I. Howard Marshall and W. Ward Gasque. New International Greek Testament Commentary. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1991.

________. The Letter to the Ephesians. Pillar New Testament Commentary. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1999.

Olmstead, A. T. History of Assyria. Chicago: University of Chicago Press, 1968.

Olyan, S. M. “The Oaths of Amos 8:14.” Pages 121-49 in Priesthood and Cult in Ancient Israel. Edited by G. A. Anderson and S. M. Olyan. Journal for the Study of the Old Testament: Supplement Series 125. Sheffield: Sheffield Academic Press, 1991.

Orelli, Conrad von. The Prophecies of Jeremiah. Edinburgh: T&T Clark, 1889.

Ortlund, Raymond C. Whoredom: God’s Unfaithful Wife in Biblical Theology. New Studies in Biblical Theology. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1996.

Orton, David E. The Understanding Scribe: Matthew and the Apocalyptic Ideal. Journal for the Study of the New Testament: Supplement Series 25. Sheffield: Sheffield Academic Press, 1989.

Osburn, Carroll D. “The Text of 1 Corinthians 10:9.” Pages 201-11 in New Testament Textual Criticism: Its Significance for Exegesis. Edited by Eldon Jay Epp and Gordon D. Fee. Oxford: Clarendon, 1981.

Oswalt, John N. The Book of Isaiah. 2 vols. New International Commentary on the Old Testament. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1986-1998.

Parke-Taylor, Geoffrey H. Yahweh: The Divine Name in the Bible. Waterloo, Ont.: Wilfrid Laurier University Press, 1975.

Paterson, J. A. The Book of Numbers. Baltimore: Johns Hopkins, 1900.

Patterson, Richard Duane. Nahum, Habakkuk, Zephaniah. Wycliffe Exegetical Commentary. Chicago: Moody, 1991.

Paul, Shalom M. Amos. Hermeneia. Minneapolis: Fortress, 1991.

Perowne, T. T. The Proverbs. Cambridge Bible for Schools and Colleges. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1899.

Pfeiffer, Charles F., and Howard Frederic Vos. The Wycliffe Historical Geography of Bible Lands. Chicago: Moody, 1967.

Pitard, Wayne Thomas. Ancient Damascus: A Historical Study of the Syrian City-State From Earliest Times Until Its Fall to the Assyrians in 732 B.C.E. Winona Lake, Ind.: Eisenbrauns, 1986.

Plaut, W. Gunther. Book of Proverbs. Jewish Commentary for Bible Readers: Union Adult Series. New York: Union of American Hebrew Congregations, 1961.

Plummer, Alfred. A Critical and Exegetical Commentary on the Second Epistle of St. Paul to the Corinthians. International Critical Commentary. Edinburgh: T&T Clark, 1915.

Polley, M. E. Amos and the Davidic Empire: A Socio-Historical Approach. New York: Oxford University Press, 1989.

Polzin, R., and D. Robertson. Studies in the Book of Job. Semeia 7. Missoula, Mont.: Scholars, 1977.

Pope, Marvin H. Song of Songs. Anchor Bible 7C. Garden City, N.Y.: Doubleday, 1977.

Post, George Edward. Flora of Syria, Palestine and Sinai: A Handbook of the Flowering Plants and Ferns, Native and Naturalized From the Taurus to Ras Muhammad and From the Mediterranean Sea to the Syrian Desert. Edited by John Edward Dinsmore. 2d ed. Beirut: American, 1932.

Pritchard, James B., ed. The Ancient Near East. 2 vols. Princeton: Princeton University Press, 1973.

Propp, William H. C. Exodus 1-18. Anchor Bible 2. New York: Doubleday, 1999.

Räisänen, Heikki. Paul and the Law. Wissenschaftliche Untersuchungen zum Neuen Testament 29. Tübingen: Mohr, 1983.

Redford, Donald B. A Study of the Biblical Story of Joseph (Genesis 37-50). Supplements to Vetus Testamentum 20. Leiden: Brill, 1970.

Reymond, Philippe. L’eau, sa vie, et sa signification dans l’Ancien Testament. Supplements to Vetus Testamentum 6. Leiden: Brill, 1958.

Ridderbos, J. Isaiah. Bible Student’s Commentary. Grand Rapids: Regency Reference Library, 1985.

Ringgren, Helmer. Religions of the Ancient Near East. Translated by John Sturdy. Philadelphia: Westminster, 1973.

Ringgren, Helmer, and Walther Zimmerli. Sprüche/Prediger. 3d ed. Das Alte Testament Deutsch. Göttingen: Vandenhoeck & Ruprecht, 1980.

Roberts, J. J. M. Nahum, Habakkuk, and Zephaniah. Old Testament Library. Louisville: Westminster/John Knox, 1991.

Robertson, A. T. A Grammar of the Greek New Testament in the Light of Historical Research. 4th ed. Nashville: Broadman, 1934.

Robertson, Archibald, and Alfred Plummer. A Critical and Exegetical Commentary on the First Epistle of St. Paul to the Corinthians. 2d ed. International Critical Commentary. Edinburgh: T&T Clark, 1914.

Robinson, H. Wheeler. Inspiration and Revelation in the Old Testament. Oxford: Clarendon, 1946.

Rodriguez, Angel M. Substitution in the Hebrew Cultus. Andrews University Seminary Doctoral Dissertations Series 3. Berrien Springs, Mich.: Andrews University Press, 1979.

Rosenthal, Franz. A Grammar of Biblical Aramaic. 6th ed. Porta Linguarum Orientalium 5. Wiesbaden: Harrassowitz, 1995.

Ross, Allen P. Creation and Blessing: A Guide to the Study and Exposition of Genesis. Grand Rapids: Baker, 1988.

Rowley, Harold Henry. Job. New Century Bible Commentary. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1980.

Rudolph, Wilhelm. Des Buch Ruth, das Hohe Lied, die Klagelieder. Kommentar zum Alten Testament 17. Gütersloh: G. Mohn, 1962.

Sachs, Curt. The History of Musical Instruments. New York: W. W. Norton, 1940.

Saggs, H. W. F. The Greatness That Was Babylon: A Survey of the Ancient Civilization of the Tigris-Euphrates Valley. 2d ed. London: Sidgwick & Jackson, 1988.

Sarna, Nahum M. Exodus. Jerusalem Publication Society Torah Commentary. Philadelphia: Jewish Publication Society, 1991.

Sasson, Jack M. Ruth. 2d ed. The Biblical Seminar 10. Sheffield: Sheffield Academic Press, 1995.

Schaberg, Jane. The Father, the Son, and the Holy Spirit: The Triadic Phrase in Matthew 28:19b. Society of Biblical Literature Dissertation Series 61. Chico, Calif.: Scholars, 1982.

Schley, Donald G. Shiloh: A Biblical City in Tradition and History. Journal for the Study of the Old Testament: Supplement Series 63. Sheffield: JSOT, 1989.

Schnackenburg, Rudolf. The Gospel According to St. John. 3 vols. New York: Seabury, 1968-1982.

Schramm, E. M. “Poetic Patterning in Biblical Hebrew.” Pages 175-78 in Michigan Oriental Studies in Honor of George G. Cameron. Edited by Louis Lawrence Orlin. Ann Arbor: University of Michigan, 1976.

Scott, R. B. Y. Proverbs, Ecclesiastes. 2d ed. Anchor Bible 18. Garden City, N.Y.: Doubleday, 1970.

Segal, Judah Benzion. The Hebrew Passover From the Earliest Times to A.D. 70. London Oriental Series 12. New York: Oxford University Press, 1963.

Sherwin-White, A. N. Roman Society and Roman Law in the New Testament. The Sarum Lectures, 1960-1961. Oxford: Clarendon, 1963.

________. “The Trial of Christ.” Pages 97-116 in Historicity and Chronology in the New Testament. Edited by D. E. Nineham. Society for Promoting Christian Knowledge Theological Collections 6. London: SPCK, 1965.

Silva, Moisés. Philippians. Baker Exegetical Commentary on the New Testament. Grand Rapids: Baker, 1992.

Simons, J. The Geographical and Topographical Texts of the Old Testament. Studia Francisci Scholten Memoriae Dicata 2. Leiden: Brill, 1959.

Simpson, William Kelly, ed. The Literature of Ancient Egypt: An Anthology of Stories, Instructions, and Poetry. New Haven: Yale University Press, 1972.

Skehan, Patrick W. Studies in Israelite Poetry and Wisdom. Catholic Biblical Quarterly Monograph Series 1. Washington: Catholic Biblical Association of America, 1971.

Skinner, John. A Critical and Exegetical Commentary on Genesis. 2d ed. International Critical Commentary. Edinburgh: T&T Clark, 1930.

Smick, E. B. “A Study of the Structure of the Third Balaam Oracle.” Pages 242-52 in The Law and the Prophets. Edited by John H. Skilton. Nutley, N.J.: Presbyterian and Reformed, 1974.

Smith, Gary V. Amos. Library of Biblical Interpretation. Grand Rapids: Regency Reference Library, 1989.

Smith, Ralph L. Micah-Malachi. Word Biblical Commentary 32. Waco, Tex.: Word, 1984.

Snaith, Norman Henry. The Jewish New Year Festival: Its Origins and Development. London: SPCK, 1947.

________. Leviticus and Numbers. New Century Bible Commentary. London: Nelson, 1967.

Soggin, J. Alberto. Judges. Old Testament Library. Philadelphia: Westminster, 1981.

Speiser, E. A. Genesis. Anchor Bible 1. Garden City, N.Y.: Doubleday, 1964.

________. “The Wife-Sister Motif in the Patriarchal Narratives.” Pages 62-81 in Oriental and Biblical Studies. Edited by J. J. Finkelstein and M. Greenberg. Philadelphia: University of Philadelphia, 1967.

Spurrell, George James. Notes on the Text of the Book of Genesis. 2d ed. Oxford: Clarendon, 1896.

Stadelmann, Luis I. J. The Hebrew Conception of the World. Analecta Biblica 39. Rome: Pontifical Biblical Institute, 1970.

Stamm, Johann Jakob, and M. E. Andrew. The Ten Commandments in Recent Research. Studies in Biblical Theology: Second Series 2. Naperville, Ill.: A. R. Allenson, 1967.

Stein, Robert H. Luke. New American Commentary 24. Nashville: Broadman, 1992.

Streck, Maximilian. Assurbanipal und die letzten assyrischen könige bis zum untergange Niniveh’s. 3 vols. Vorderasiatische Bibliothek 7. Leipzig: J. C. Hinrichs, 1918.

Stuart, Douglas K. Hosea-Jonah. Word Biblical Commentary 31. Waco, Tex.: Word, 1987.

Sutcliffe, Edmund F. The Old Testament and the Future Life. London: Burns Oates & Washbourne, 1946.

Swartley, Willard M. Slavery, Sabbath, War, and Women: Case Issues in Biblical Interpretation. Scottdale, Pa.: Herald, 1983.

Szpek, Heidi M. Translation Technique in the Peshitta to Job. Society of Biblical Literature Dissertation Series 137. Atlanta: Scholars, 1992.

Theissen, Gerd. Psychologische Aspekte paulinischer Theologie. Forschungen zur Religion und Literatur des Alten und Neuen Testaments 131. Göttingen: Vandenhoeck & Ruprecht, 1983.

Thomas, D. W. “בְּלִיַּעַל in the Old Testament.” Pages 11-19 in Biblical and Patristic Studies in Memory of Robert Pierce Casey. Edited by J. Neville Birdsall and Robert W. Thomson. New York: Herder, 1963.

Thompson, J. A. “Numbers.” Pages 168-200 in New Bible Commentary: Revised. Edited by D. Guthrie and J. A. Motyer. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1970.

________. “The Date of the Book of Joel.” Pages 453-64 in A Light Unto My Path: Old Testament Studies in Honor of Jacob M. Myers. Edited by Howard N. Bream, Ralph D. Heim, and Carey A. Moore. Gettysburg Theological Studies 4. Philadelphia: Temple University Press, 1974.

________. Deuteronomy. Tyndale Old Testament Commentaries. London: InterVarsity, 1974.

________. The Book of Jeremiah. New International Commentary on the Old Testament. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1980.

Thompson, K. C. “I Corinthians 15, 29 and Baptism for the Dead.” Pages 647-59 in Studia Evangelica, Vol. 2, Part I. Edited by F. L. Cross. Texte und Untersuchungen 87. Berlin: Akademie, 1964.

Thompson, R. Campbell, and Richard Wyatt Hutchinson. A Century of Exploration At Nineveh. London: Luzac, 1929.

Thompson, R. J. Penitence and Sacrifice in Early Israel outside the Levitical Law: An Examination of the Fellowship Theory of Early Israelite Sacrfice. Leiden: Brill, 1963.

Tigay, Jeffrey H., ed. Empirical Models for Biblical Criticism. Philadelphia: University of Pennsylvania, 1985.

________. Deuteronomy. Jerusalem Publication Society Torah Commentary. Philadelphia: Jewish Publication Society, 1996.

Toy, Crawford H. A Critical and Exegetical Commentary on the Book of Proverbs. International Critical Commentary. 1899. Repr., Edinburgh: T&T Clark, 1970.

Tromp, Nicholas J. Primitive Conceptions of Death and the Nether World in the Old Testament. Biblica et orientalia 21. Rome: Pontifical Biblical Institute, 1969.

Ulrich, Eugene Charles. The Qumran Text of Samuel and Josephus. Harvard Semitic Monographs 19. Missoula, Mont.: Scholars, 1978.

Van Dam, Cornelis. The Urim and Thummim: A Means of Revelation in Ancient Israel. Winona Lake, Ind.: Eisenbrauns, 1997.

Vaulx, Jacques de. Les Nombres. Sources bibliques. Paris: Gabalda, 1972.

Vaux, Roland de. Studies in Old Testament Sacrifice. Cardiff: University of Wales Press, 1964.

________. Ancient Israel: Its Life and Institutions. Edited by Astrid Beck and David Noel Freedman. Translated by John McHugh. The Biblical Resource Series. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1997.

Vergote, Jozef. Joseph en Égypte. Louvain: Publications Universitaires, 1959.

Vermès, Géza. Scripture and Tradition in Judaism. Studia post-biblica 4. Leiden: Brill, 1961.

Vogt, Ernst. Lexicon linguae aramaicae Veteris Testamenti documentis antiquis illustratum. Rome: Pontifical Biblical Institute, 1971.

von Rad, Gerhard. Genesis: A Commentary. Translated by John H. Marks. Old Testament Library. Philadelphia: Westminster, 1961.

________. Biblical Interpretations in Preaching. Translated by John E. Steely. Nashville: Abingdon, 1977.

________. God At Work in Israel. Translated by John H. Marks. Nashville: Abingdon, 1980.

Waterfield, Gordon. Layard of Nineveh. New York: F. A. Praeger, 1963.

Watson, Wilfred G. E. Classical Hebrew Poetry. Journal for the Study of the Old Testament: Supplement Series 26. Sheffield: JSOT, 1984.

Watts, John D. W. Isaiah. 2 vols. Word Biblical Commentary 24-25. Waco, Tex.: Word, 1985-1987.

Webb, Barry G. The Book of the Judges: An Integrated Reading. Journal for the Study of the Old Testament: Supplement Series 46. Sheffield: JSOT, 1987.

Weinfeld, Moshe. Deuteronomy 1-11: A New Translation with Introduction and Commentary. 1st ed. Anchor Bible 5. New York: Doubleday, 1991.

Wenham, Gordon J. The Book of Leviticus. New International Commentary on the Old Testament. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1979.

________. Numbers. Tyndale Old Testament Commentaries 4. Downers Grove, Ill.: InterVarsity, 1981.

________. “The Religion of the Patriarchs.” Pages 157-88 in Essays on the Patriarchal Narratives. Edited by A. Millard and D. Wiseman. Winona Lake, Ind.: Eisenbrauns, 1983.

________. Genesis. 2 vols. Word Biblical Commentary 1, 2. Dallas: Word, 1987-1994.

Wenham, John William. The Enigma of Evil: Can We Believe in the Goodness of God? Grand Rapids: Academie, 1985.

Westcott, B. F., and F. J. A. Hort. The New Testament in the Original Greek. 2 vols. Cambridge: Macmillan, 1881.

Westermann, Claus. Blessing in the Bible and the Life of the Church. Overtures to Biblical Theology. Philadelphia: Fortress, 1978.

________.Genesis. Translated by John J. Scullion. 3 vols. Minneapolis, Minn.: Augsburg, 1984-1986.

________. Basic Forms of Prophetic Speech. Translated by Hugh Clayton White. Louisville: Westminster John Knox, 1991.

White, John Bradley. A Study of the Language of Love in the Song of Songs and Ancient Egyptian Poetry. Society of Biblical Literature Dissertation Series 38. Missoula, Mont.: Scholars, 1978.

Whybray, R. N. The Heavenly Counsellor in Isaiah xl 13-14: A Study of the Sources of the Theology of Deutero-Isaiah. Society for Old Testament Study Monograph Series 1. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1971.

________. The Book of Proverbs. Cambridge Bible Commentary. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 1972.

________. Isaiah 40-66. Edited by Ronald E. Clements and Matthew Black. New Century Bible Commentary. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1981.

Widengren, Geo. Sakrales Königtum im Alten Testament und im Judentum. Stuttgart: W. Kohlhammer, 1955.

Wildberger, Hans. Isaiah. 3 vols. Continental Commentaries. Minneapolis: Fortress, 1991.

Williams, Ronald J. “The Passive Qal Theme in Hebrew.” Essays on the Ancient Semitic World. Edited by John W. Wevers and Donald B. Redford. Toronto: University of Toronto Press, 1970.

________. Hebrew Syntax: An Outline. 2d ed. Toronto: University of Toronto Press, 1976.

Williamson, H. G. M. Ezra, Nehemiah. Word Biblical Commentary. Waco, Tex.: Word, 1985.

Wilson, J. A. “Egypt.” Pages 39-133 in Before Philosophy: The Intellectual Adventure of Ancient Man. Edited by Henri Frankfort, H. A. Groenewegen-Frankfort, J. A. Wilson, and Thorkild Jacobsen. Baltimore: Penguin, 1949.

Wilson, R. D. “Yahweh [Jehovah] and Exodus 6:3.” Pages 29-40 in Classical Evangelical Essays in Old Testament Interpretation. Edited by Walter C. Kaiser. Grand Rapids: Baker, 1972.

Wilson, Robert R. Prophecy and Society in Ancient Israel. Philadelphia: Fortress, 1980.

Winnett, F. V. The Mosaic Tradition. Near and Middle East Series 1. Toronto: University of Toronto Press, 1949.

Wiseman, D. J., ed. Peoples of Old Testament Times. Oxford: Clarendon, 1973.

Wolff, Hans Walter. Hosea. Hermeneia. Philadelphia: Fortress, 1974.

________. Joel and Amos. Hermeneia. Philadelphia: Fortress, 1977.

________. Anthropology of the Old Testament. Philadelphia: Fortress, 1981.

Wood, D. R. W., ed. New Bible Dictionary. 3d ed. Downers Grove, Ill.: InterVarsity, 1996.

Wright, David P. The Disposal of Impurity: Elimination Rites in the Bible and in Hittite and Mesopotamian Literature. Society of Biblical Literature Dissertation Series 101. Atlanta: Scholars, 1987.

Wright, Ruth V., and Robert L. Chadbourne. Gems and Minerals of the Bible. New York: Harper & Row, 1970.

Wuellner, Wilhelm H. The Meaning of “Fishers of Men.” The New Testament Library. Philadelphia: Westminster, 1967.

Yadin, Yigael. The Art of Warfare in Biblical Lands in the Light of Archaeological Study. Translated by M. Pearlman. New York: McGraw-Hill, 1963.

Yamauchi, Edwin M. “Cultic Prostitution.” Pages 213-23 in Orient and Occident: Essays Presented to Cyrus H. Gordon on the Occasion of His Sixty-Fifth Birthday. Edited by Harry A. Hoffner. Alter Orient und Altes Testament 22. Neukirchen-Vluyn: Neukirchener Verlag, 1973.

________. Foes From the Northern Frontier: Invading Hordes From the Russian Steppes. Studies in Biblical Archaeology. Grand Rapids: Baker, 1982.

Young, Edward J. My Servants, the Prophets. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1952.

________. The Book of Isaiah. 3 vols. New International Commentary on the Old Testament. Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1965-1972.

Zerwick, Maximilian. Biblical Greek: Illustrated by Examples (Graecitas Biblica). Translated by and adapted from the 4th Latin edition by Joseph Smith. Scripta Pontificii Instituti Biblici 114. Rome: Pontifical Biblical Institute, 1963.

Zimmerli, Walther. Ezekiel. Translated by Ronald E. Clements. 2 vols. Hermeneia. Philadelphia: Fortress, 1979-1983.

Zöckler, Otto. The Proverbs of Solomon. Translated and edited by Charles A. Aiken. Commentary on the Holy Scriptures: Old Testament 10. New York: Charles Scribner, 1870.

Zuntz, Günther. The Text of the Epistles: A Disquisition Upon the Corpus Paulinum. The Schweich Lectures of the British Academy. London: Oxford University Press, 1953.

Abbreviations and Introduction
to Principal Manuscript Evidence 
for the Greek New Testament

No ancient literature has survived in its original form; everything we have is derived from copies of the originals. The NT is no exception. However, in comparison with any other ancient literature, the NT is without a peer—both in terms of the chronological proximity and the surviving number. Several ancient authorities are preserved in only a handful of manuscripts. Not so with the NT. There are approximately 5,500 Greek witnesses, ranging in date from the second century AD into the middle ages. Besides the Greek evidence, there are nearly 30,000 versional copies (e.g., Latin, Coptic, and Syriac), and over 1,000,000 quotations from the NT in the church Fathers. NT textual criticism has always had an embarrassment of riches unparalleled in any other field.

The Greek Witnesses

The Greek witnesses are by far the most important, since in large measure they represent some of our earliest witnesses and since they involve direct reproduction from Greek to Greek. There are four kinds of Greek witnesses: papyri, uncials (or majuscules), minuscules (or cursives), and lectionaries. The first three are important enough to warrant some discussion here.

Papyri

These documents are written on the cheap writing materials of the ancient world that were roughly equivalent to modern paper. Literally thousands of papyrus fragments have been found of which approximately 100 contain portions of the New Testament. Actually, taken together, these 100 fragments constitute over half of the New Testament and all but four are in the form of codices (i.e., four are scrolls rather than the book-form [codex]). All NT papyri were written with uncial or capital letters. They range in date from the early second century through the eighth century. About 50 of them are to be dated before the fourth century. Though many of them are somewhat fragmentary, and at times the copying was looser than one would like (i.e., they were done before the canon was officially recognized), they are nevertheless extremely important for establishing the text of the New Testament—if for no other reason than the fact that they represent some of the most ancient witnesses we possess. Five important papyri are illustrated in the chart below. The symbol for each papyrus is P followed by a number (e.g., P45). The most important papyri cited in the NET NT footnotes are as follows:

Papyri

Name

Date

NT Books 
Covered

General Characteristics

P45

Chester Beatty papyrus

3rd century AD

Gospels, Acts 4-17

Mark (Caesarean); Matt, Luke, John (intermediate between Alexandrian and Western texttypes)

P46

Chester Beatty papyrus

ca. AD 200

10 Pauline Epistles (all but Pastorals) and Hebrews

Overall closer to Alexandrian than Western

P47

Chester Beatty papyrus

3rd century AD

Revelation 9:10-17:2

Alexandrian; often agrees with Sinaiticus (א)

P66

Bodmer Papyrus

ca. AD 200

John

Mixed text between Western and Alexandrian

P75

Bodmer papyrus

early 3rd century

Luke and John

Alexandrian, often agrees with B

Uncials

There are approximately 300 uncials known to exist today that contain portions of the New Testament and one uncial that contains the entire NT. Like the papyri, these manuscripts were written with uncial or capital letters, but unlike the papyri they were written on animal skins or vellum. For the most part they are beautiful manuscripts, elegantly written and routinely done in scriptoria and often for special purposes. Generally speaking, they range in date from the fourth through the ninth centuries. Our oldest complete copy of the NT is an uncial manuscript, א (see chart below). The symbol for each uncial is either a capital letter (in Latin or Greek letters [though one ms has a Hebrew letter, א]) or a number beginning with 0 (e.g., 01, 0220, etc.). The most important uncials cited in the NET NT footnotes are as follows:

Uncial

Name

Date (approx.)

NT Books 
Covered

General 

Characteristics

א (01)

Aleph or 

Sinaiticus

4th century

The entire NT

Alexandrian; best in epistles

A (02)

Alexandrinus

5th century

Most of the NT

Important in the Epistles and Revelation

B (03)

Vaticanus

4th century

Most of NT except Hebrews 9:14ff, the Pastorals, Phlm, Rev

Alexandrian; best in Gospels

C (04)

Ephraemi 
Rescriptus

5th century

Portions of every book except 2 Thess and 2 John 

mixed

D (05)

Bezae/
Cantabrigiensis

5th century

Gospels and Acts

Western

D (06)

Claromontanus

6th century

Pauline Epistles and Hebrews

Western

F (010)

Augiensis

9th century

Pauline Epistles

Western

G (012)

Boernerianus

9th century

Pauline Epistles 

Western

L (019)

Regius

8th century

Gospels

Often agrees with Vaticanus

W (032)

Washingtonianus

early 5th century

Gospels

mixed; earliest representation of Byzantine texttype. Alexandrian in John 5:12-21:25.

Θ (038)

Koridethi

9th century

Gospels

The text of Mark is similar to that used by Origen and Eusebius in the third and fourth centuries at Caesarea

Ψ (044)

Athous Laurae

8th/ 9th century

Gospels/Acts/

Paul/General Epistles

Contains Alexandrian, Western, and Byzantine influences

Minuscules

There are approximately 2,813 NT Greek minuscule manuscripts known to us today. These copies range in date from the ninth to sixteenth centuries, were produced on vellum or paper, and were written in cursive or a lower-case, flowing hand. They are the best representatives of the medieval ecclesiastical text, that is, the Byzantine text. There are approximately 150-200 that deviate from the Byzantine standard, almost always representing an earlier transmissional stream and hence quite important for NT textual criticism. The symbols for the minuscules are of three kinds: (a) Arabic numbers (e.g., 1, 565, 1739), each of which represents one manuscript; (b) “family 1,” [Ë1] “family 13” [Ë13] (involving a group of closely associated manuscripts); (c) Byz (involving the majority of Byzantine minuscules). The following are among the more important witnesses cited in the NET NT notes:

Minuscule

Date (approx.)

NT Books Covered

General Characteristics

33

9th century

Gospels, Acts, Paul, Catholic Epistles

Alexandrian 

81

AD 1044

Acts, Paul, Catholic Epistles

Very important for establishing the text of Acts. Agrees substantially with the Alexandrian texttype.

1739

10th century, but probably goes back to a late 4th century ms

Acts, Paul, Catholic Epistles

Alexandrian

Family 1 (Ë1)

12th-14th centuries

Gospels

Caesarean (of the 3rd or 4th centuries)

Family 13 (Ë13)

11th-15th centuries

Gospels

Important in the discussion of the authenticity of the pericope adulterae (i.e., John 7:53-8:11)

Versional Evidence

Versions were initially prepared for missionary purposes. The history and transmission of versions are often quite complex, and scholars often do not agree on or do not know the particular dates or characteristics of the versions. The chart below contains the major versions cited in the notes; the most important abbreviations are listed, but not all abbreviations are indicated. For more information on the versional evidence for the NT, consult B. M. Metzger, The Text of the New Testament (3d ed.; New York: Oxford University Press, 1992), 67-86; B. M. Metzger, The Early Versions of the New Testament (Oxford: Clarendon, 1977); and B. D. Ehrman and M. W. Holmes, eds., The Text of the New Testament in Contemporary Research: Essays on the Status Quaestionis (Studies and Documents 46; Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1995), 75-187.

Version

Abbreviations

Date (approx.)

General Characteristics

Vulgate and part of the Itala witnesses

lat

2nd to 3rd century

Western, Alexandrian, and others

Itala

it

3rd century

Western

Vulgate

vg

4th century and later

extensive cross-contamination of texttypes

Syriac

syr

2nd to 6th centuries

Old Syriac (syrc and syrs) is generally Western. The Peshitta (syrp) has a mixed text in Gospels and Epistles, Western in Acts. The Harclean version (syrh) of Acts is Western. The Palestinian Syriac (syrpal) is generally Caesarean.

Coptic

cop

3rd and 4th centuries (Sahidic dialect is 4th to 5th centuries; Bohairic dialect is 9th century)

generally Alexandrian in the entire tradition; Sahidic (sa) and Bohairic (bo) are Alexandrian with numerous Western readings

Armenian

arm

5th century

generally Caesarean but sections are Byzantine, and the mss of Paul show strong Alexandrian affinities

Georgian

geo

5th century

mixed texttypes; generally Caesarean, but becoming strongly Byzantine in later mss

Ethiopic

eth

exact date unknown, but most likely within the 4th to 5th centuries

mixed text, but generally early Byzantine

Slavonic

slav

9th century

Byzantine

Patristic Evidence

A tremendous source for evidence of the Greek NT are citations found in early Church Fathers. They help to locate and date various readings and texttypes found in the manuscripts and versions. This field is quite complex for two broad reasons: (1) It is often difficult to determine if what the Father actually wrote has been preserved in the extant manuscripts or if corruption has occurred. (2) It is often difficult to determine if a Father is citing a text verbatim, paraphrasing it, or alluding to it. All of the Fathers cited in the notes are listed below. For more information on the patristic evidence for the NT, consult B. M. Metzger, The Text of the New Testament (3d ed.; New York: Oxford University Press, 1992), 86-92; and B. D. Ehrman and M. W. Holmes, eds., The Text of the New Testament in Contemporary Research: Essays on the Status Quaestionis (Studies and Documents 46; Grand Rapids: Eerdmans, 1995), 189-236.

Ambrose of Milan, d. 397

Ambrosiaster of Rome, active 366-384

Athanasius, Bishop of Alexandria, d. 373

Augustine, Bishop of Hippo, d. 430

Chromatius, d. 407

Chrysostom, Bishop of Constantinople, d. 407

Clement of Alexandria, d. before 215

Cyprian, Bishop of Carthage, d. 258

Cyril of Alexandria, d. 444

Cyril-Jerusalem, d. 386

Didymus of Alexandria, d. 398

Ephraem the Syrian, d. 373

Epiphanius, Bishop of Salamis, d. 403

Eusebius, Bishop of Caesarea, d. 339 or 340

Hesychius of Jerusalem, d. after 451 

Hilary of Poitiers, d. 367

Hippolytus of Rome, d. 235

Irenaeus, Bishop of Lyons, d. ca. 202

Jerome, d. 420

Justin Martyr, d. ca. 165

Marcion of Rome, 2nd century

Origen of Alexandria and Caesarea, d. 254

Pseudo-Athanasius, dates unknown

Serapion, d. after 362

Severian, d. after 408

Tertullian of Carthage, d. after 220

Theodore of Mopsuestia in Cilicia, d. 428

Victorinus-Pettau, d. 304

Hebrew and Greek Transliteration

Throughout the notes most Hebrew and Greek words or phrases will be transliterated into English. General guidelines for transliteration are as follows: Hebrew and Greek words or phrases in study notes will always be transliterated. Hebrew and Greek in translator’s notes and text-critical notes will usually be transliterated, but there are some exceptions. Only the first occurrence of a word in any note will be transliterated. Hebrew and Greek words contained in citations of lexical tools (e.g., BDAG 2 s.v. ἄβυσσος) will not be transliterated, nor will Hebrew or Greek words and phrases contained in direct quotations. When appropriate (based on the context within the note) the translation of the word or phrase will follow the transliteration. If a Hebrew or Greek phrase in the notes is extensive, in many cases it will not be transliterated for stylistic reasons to avoid unnecessary length and awkwardness. Occasionally a Hebrew word will be written with radicals only and no vowel pointing; in this case there will be no transliteration. As per the Unicode® specification for the Hebrew language, furtive patakh has the same placement as the patakh.

Hebrew/English Transliteration

Hebrew Letter

Transliteration

Pronunciation

Š Medial

Final

Š Š alef 

א

Š ’

glottal stop (no sound)

bet

בּ

Š b

b as in bat

bet (spirant)

ב

Š v

v as in victor

gimel

ג

Š g

g as in good

dalet

ד

Š d

d as in dog

he

ה

Š h

h as in hat

vav

ו

Š v

v as in victor

zayin

ז

Š z

z as in zoo

khet

ח

Š kh

Scottish ch as in loch

tet

ט

Š t

t as in top

yod

י

Š y

y as in young

kaf

כּ

Š k

k as in king

kaf (spirant)

כ

ך

kh

Scottish ch as in loch

lamed

ל

Š l

l as in long

mem

מ

ם

m

m as in mice

nun

נ

ן

n

n as in nice

samek

ס

Š s

s as in see

ayin

ע

Š ’

glottal stop (no sound)

pe

פּ

Š p

p as in pit

pe (spirant)

פ

ף

f

f as in food

tsade

צ

ץ

ts

ts as in hats

qof

ק

Š q

k as in king

resh

ר

Š r

r as in red

sin

שׂ

Š s

s as in see

shin

שׁ

Š sh

sh as in shoe

tav

ת

Š t

t as in top

Hebrew Vowels

Transliteration

Pronunciation

patakh

ַ

a

a as in father

furtive patakh 

(see above)

a

a as in father

qamets

ָ

a

a as in father

final qamets he

ָה

ah

a as in father

3ms suffix

ָיו

ayv

av as in avant garde

segol

ֶ

e

e as in met

tsere

ֵ

e

e as in they

tsere yod

ֵי

e

e as in they

segol yod

ֶי

e

e as in they

short hireq

ִ

i

i as in unique

long hireq

ִ

i

i as in unique

hireq yod

ִי

i

i as in unique

qamets khatuf

ָ

o

o as in loft

holem

ֹ

o

o as in role

full holem

וֹ

o

o as in role

short qibbuts

ֻ

u

u as in rule

long qibbuts

ֻ

u

u as in rule

shureq

וּ

u

u as in rule

khatef patakh

ֲ

a

a as in am

khatef segol

ֱ

e

e as in met

khatef qamets

ֳ

o

o as in loft

vocal shewa

ְ

é

e as in met

silent shewa

ְ

omitted

none

Greek/English Transliteration

Greek Letter

English 

Pronunciation

Š Upper

Case

Lower

Case

Š Š Alpha

Α

α 

a

a as in father

Beta

Β

β

b

b as in bat

Gamma

Γ

γ

g

g as in good

Delta

Δ

δ

d

d as in dog

Epsilon

Ε

ε

e

e as in get

Zeta

Ζ

ζ

z

dz as in adds

Eta

Η

η

ē

e as in they

Theta

Θ

θ

th

th as in think

Iota

Ι

ι

i

i as in thin or think

Kappa

Κ

κ

k

k as in king

Lambda

Λ

λ

l

l as in long

Mu

Μ

μ

m

m as in mice

Nu

Ν

ν

n

n as in nice

Xi

Ξ

ξ

x

x as in ax

Omicron

Ο

ο

o

o as in got

Pi

Π

π

p

p as in pit

Rho

Ρ

ρ

r

r as in red

Sigma

Σ

σ 

(final = ς)

s

s as in see

Tau

Τ

τ

t

t as in top

Upsilon

Υ

υ

u

u as the oo in book

Phi

Φ

φ

ph

ph as in phase

Chi

Χ

χ

ch

Scottish ch as in loch

Psi

Ψ

ψ

y

ps as in tipsy

Omega

Ω

ω

ō

o as in boat

Rough breathing mark

Š ῾

J

ἡμῖν = Jēmin

ὥστε = Jōste

υἱός = Juios

